4274 | damage (noun): a change for the worse, harm done | loc: пошкодження
  EN TS: Just a "little" damage.
  ua TS: Лише «трохи» пошкоджень.
  EN FS: Just a "little" snow.
  ua FS: Лише «трохи» снігу.
  EN TP: damage to a parked car
  ua TP: пошкодження припаркованого авто
  EN FP: damage to a bicycle
  ua FP: пошкодження велосипеда
4275 | complain (verb): to express displeasure or unhappiness | loc: скаржитися
  EN TS: She is complaining about the car.
  ua TS: Вона скаржиться на машину.
  EN FS: She is complaining about the bike.
  ua FS: Вона скаржиться на велосипед.
  EN TP: to complain about a crash
  ua TP: скаржитися на аварію
  EN FP: to complain about the food
  ua FP: скаржитися на їжу
4276 | elderly (adjective): advanced in years, old | loc: літній
  EN TS: An elderly lady is going home.
  ua TS: Літня пані йде додому.
  EN FS: An elderly man is going home.
  ua FS: Літній чоловік йде додому.
  EN TP: an elderly woman walking
  ua TP: літня жінка йде
  EN FP: an elderly woman dancing
  ua FP: літня жінка танцює
4277 | accountant (noun): someone who keeps and checks business accounts | loc: бухгалтер
  EN TS: The accountant found it!
  ua TS: Бухгалтер таки знайшов!
  EN FS: The accountant lost it!
  ua FS: Бухгалтер таки загубив!
  EN TP: an accountant with receipts
  ua TP: бухгалтер із чеками
  EN FP: an accountant on holiday
  ua FP: бухгалтер у відпустці
4279 | theatre (noun): a building where plays or films are shown | loc: театр
  EN TS: Nobody came to the theatre!
  ua TS: До театру ніхто не прийшов!
  EN FS: Nobody came to the stadium!
  ua FS: На стадіон ніхто не прийшов!
  EN TP: a theatre stage
  ua TP: сцена театру
  EN FP: a theatre ticket
  ua FP: квиток до театру
4280 | filming (noun): the act of making a film | loc: зйомка
  EN TS: Filming day: she is in tears.
  ua TS: День зйомок: вона в сльозах.
  EN FS: Filming day: she is laughing.
  ua FS: День зйомок: вона сміється.
  EN TP: filming a sad scene
  ua TP: зйомка сумної сцени
  EN FP: filming a cooking show
  ua FP: зйомка кулінарного шоу
4281 | change (noun): when something passes from one state to another | loc: зміна
  EN TS: The colour change is amazing.
  ua TS: Зміна кольору вражає.
  EN FS: The size change is amazing.
  ua FS: Зміна розміру вражає.
  EN TP: a change of colour
  ua TP: зміна кольору
  EN FP: a change of clothes
  ua FP: зміна одягу
4282 | shelter (noun): a place that cares for animals with no home | loc: притулок
  EN TS: They got a dog from a shelter.
  ua TS: Вони взяли собаку з притулку.
  EN FS: They got a cat from a shelter.
  ua FS: Вони взяли кота з притулку.
  EN TP: a dog from a shelter
  ua TP: собака з притулку
  EN FP: a shelter from the rain
  ua FP: притулок від дощу
4283 | cooking (noun): preparing food with heat | loc: готування
  EN TS: Her cooking gets applause!
  ua TS: Її готуванню аплодують!
  EN FS: Her singing gets applause!
  ua FS: Її співу аплодують!
  EN TP: a cooking class
  ua TP: урок готування
  EN FP: a cooking contest
  ua FP: конкурс з готування
4284 | rush (noun): the act of moving hurriedly and carelessly | loc: поспіх
  EN TS: He is leaving in a rush!
  ua TS: Він іде геть у поспіху!
  EN FS: He is leaving in a car!
  ua FS: Він їде геть на машині!
  EN TP: a morning rush
  ua TP: ранковий поспіх
  EN FP: a rush hour
  ua FP: година пік
4285 | adult (noun): a fully grown person | loc: дорослий
  EN TS: Adult life means bills.
  ua TS: Доросле життя — це рахунки.
  EN FS: Adult life means games.
  ua FS: Доросле життя — це ігри.
  EN TP: an adult going to work
  ua TP: дорослий іде на роботу
  EN FP: an adult going to bed
  ua FP: дорослий іде спати
4286 | fan (verb): to move the air with something, like a fan | loc: обмахувати
  EN TS: She is fanning herself.
  ua TS: Вона обмахує себе.
  EN FS: She is fanning the cat.
  ua FS: Вона обмахує кота.
  EN TP: fanning herself in the heat
  ua TP: обмахувати себе в спеку
  EN FP: fanning a barbecue fire
  ua FP: обмахувати вогонь мангала
4287 | view (verb): to look at something carefully | loc: оглядати
  EN TS: They are viewing the flat.
  ua TS: Вони оглядають квартиру.
  EN FS: They are viewing the car.
  ua FS: Вони оглядають машину.
  EN TP: viewing an empty flat
  ua TP: оглядати порожню квартиру
  EN FP: viewing a used car
  ua FP: оглядати вживане авто
4288 | target (noun): a point or object to shoot at | loc: мішень
  EN TS: She is focusing on the target.
  ua TS: Вона зосереджена на мішені.
  EN FS: She is focusing on the camera.
  ua FS: Вона зосереджена на камері.
  EN TP: three round targets
  ua TP: три круглі мішені
  EN FP: a target on a wall
  ua FP: мішень на стіні
4289 | cold (noun): the absence of heat | loc: холод
  EN TS: The cold is blowing her back!
  ua TS: Холод аж відкидає її назад!
  EN FS: The heat is blowing her back!
  ua FS: Спека аж відкидає її назад!
  EN TP: a blast of cold
  ua TP: порив холоду
  EN FP: a cold drink
  ua FP: холодний напій
4290 | cool (verb): to make something cool or cooler | loc: охолоджувати
  EN TS: Cold air is cooling him down.
  ua TS: Холодне повітря охолоджує його.
  EN FS: Cold beer is cooling him down.
  ua FS: Холодне пиво охолоджує його.
  EN TP: cooling down under the vent
  ua TP: охолоджуватися під кондиціонером
  EN FP: cooling a drink with ice
  ua FP: охолоджувати напій льодом
4291 | forehead (noun): the part of the face above the eyes | loc: лоб
  EN TS: He is cooling his forehead. So hot!
  ua TS: Він охолоджує лоб. Ну й спека!
  EN FS: He is cooling his feet. So hot!
  ua FS: Він охолоджує ноги. Ну й спека!
  EN TP: a glass on his forehead
  ua TP: склянка на лобі
  EN FP: a kiss on the forehead
  ua FP: поцілунок у лоб
4292 | breeze (noun): a slight, refreshing wind | loc: вітерець
  EN TS: A breeze is moving her hair.
  ua TS: Вітерець куйовдить їй волосся.
  EN FS: A fan is moving her hair.
  ua FS: Вентилятор куйовдить їй волосся.
  EN TP: a breeze in the meadow
  ua TP: вітерець на луці
  EN FP: a breeze by the sea
  ua FP: вітерець біля моря
4293 | jet (noun): an airplane powered by jet engines | loc: реактивний літак
  EN TS: The jet is taking off!
  ua TS: Реактивний літак злітає!
  EN FS: The jet is landing!
  ua FS: Реактивний літак сідає!
  EN TP: a jet taking off
  ua TP: реактивний літак на зльоті
  EN FP: a jet of water
  ua FP: струмінь води
4294 | low (adverb): in a low position, near the ground | loc: низько
  EN TS: The plane is flying very low!
  ua TS: Літак летить дуже низько!
  EN FS: The kite is flying very low!
  ua FS: Повітряний змій летить дуже низько!
  EN TP: flying low over him
  ua TP: летить низько над ним
  EN FP: flying low over the sea
  ua FP: летить низько над морем
4295 | photograph (verb): to take a picture on film or a camera | loc: фотографувати
  EN TS: Look, he's photographing a plane!
  ua TS: Дивись, він фотографує літак!
  EN FS: Look, he's photographing a camel!
  ua FS: Дивись, він фотографує верблюда!
  EN TP: photographing a landing jet
  ua TP: фотографувати літак на посадці
  EN FP: photographing the desert sand
  ua FP: фотографувати пісок пустелі
4296 | signal (noun): a gesture or action that sends a message | loc: сигнал
  EN TS: Raised wands send a signal.
  ua TS: Підняті жезли подають сигнал.
  EN FS: Raised flags send a signal.
  ua FS: Підняті прапорці подають сигнал.
  EN TP: a signal to the pilot
  ua TP: сигнал пілоту
  EN FP: a weak phone signal
  ua FP: слабкий сигнал телефону
4297 | departure (noun): the act of leaving, departing | loc: від’їзд
  EN TS: The departures board is huge!
  ua TS: Табло від’їзду величезне!
  EN FS: The arrivals board is huge!
  ua FS: Табло прибуття величезне!
  EN TP: a huge departures board
  ua TP: величезне табло від’їзду
  EN FP: a departure by train
  ua FP: від’їзд потягом
4298 | straight (adverb): in a direct line, without deviation | loc: прямо
  EN TS: Boys are lining up straight.
  ua TS: Хлопчики шикуються прямо.
  EN FS: Girls are lining up straight.
  ua FS: Дівчатка шикуються прямо.
  EN TP: lining up straight
  ua TP: шикуватися прямо
  EN FP: going straight home
  ua FP: іти прямо додому
4299 | react (verb): to show a response to something | loc: реагувати
  EN TS: He reacts to cats. Poor guy.
  ua TS: Він реагує на котів. Бідолаха.
  EN FS: He reacts to dogs. Poor guy.
  ua FS: Він реагує на собак. Бідолаха.
  EN TP: reacting to a cat
  ua TP: реагувати на кота
  EN FP: reacting to bad news
  ua FP: реагувати на погані новини
4300 | rubbish (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: сміття
  EN TS: Rubbish everywhere!
  ua TS: Сміття всюди!
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere!
  ua FS: Квіти всюди!
  EN TP: bins heaped with rubbish
  ua TP: баки, переповнені сміттям
  EN FP: rubbish on a beach
  ua FP: сміття на пляжі
4301 | gap (noun): an empty space between things | loc: щілина
  EN TS: He is squeezing through a gap.
  ua TS: Він протискається крізь щілину.
  EN FS: He is crawling through a gap.
  ua FS: Він проповзає крізь щілину.
  EN TP: squeezing through a narrow gap
  ua TP: протискатися крізь вузьку щілину
  EN FP: a gap in the fence
  ua FP: щілина в паркані
4302 | emergency (noun): a sudden crisis that needs immediate action | loc: надзвичайна ситуація
  EN TS: An emergency in the rain.
  ua TS: Надзвичайна ситуація під дощем.
  EN FS: An emergency in the snow.
  ua FS: Надзвичайна ситуація під снігом.
  EN TP: an emergency at night
  ua TP: надзвичайна ситуація вночі
  EN FP: an emergency exit door
  ua FP: двері аварійного виходу
4303 | medical (adjective): relating to medicine and doctors | loc: медичний
  EN TS: A medical team is crossing.
  ua TS: Медична бригада переходить дорогу.
  EN FS: A police team is crossing.
  ua FS: Поліцейська бригада переходить дорогу.
  EN TP: a medical team crossing
  ua TP: медична бригада на переході
  EN FP: a medical exam at school
  ua FP: медичний огляд у школі
4304 | football (noun): the oval ball used in American football | loc: м'яч для американського футболу
  EN TS: He threw the football, nice.
  ua TS: Він кинув м'яч для американського футболу, клас.
  EN FS: He kicked the football, nice.
  ua FS: Він копнув м'яч для американського футболу, клас.
  EN TP: an oval football mid-air
  ua TP: м'яч для американського футболу в польоті
  EN FP: a round football on grass
  ua FP: круглий м'яч на траві
4305 | boy (noun): a young male person | loc: хлопчик
  EN TS: The boy got a huge burger.
  ua TS: Хлопчик отримав величезний бургер.
  EN FS: The boy got a huge pizza.
  ua FS: Хлопчик отримав величезну піцу.
  EN TP: a boy getting a burger
  ua TP: хлопчик отримує бургер
  EN FP: a boy cooking a burger
  ua FP: хлопчик готує бургер
4306 | prison (noun): a place where persons are locked up for punishment | loc: в'язниця
  EN TS: They are leaving prison!
  ua TS: Вони виходять із в'язниці!
  EN FS: They are entering prison!
  ua FS: Вони заходять до в'язниці!
  EN TP: leaving the prison
  ua TP: виходити з в'язниці
  EN FP: visiting a prison
  ua FP: відвідувати в'язницю
4307 | banner (noun): a long strip of cloth or paper with a message | loc: банер
  EN TS: Four banners are waving above.
  ua TS: Угорі майорять чотири банери.
  EN FS: Two banners are waving above.
  ua FS: Угорі майорять два банери.
  EN TP: banners above the stand
  ua TP: банери над трибуною
  EN FP: banners above the shop
  ua FP: банери над магазином
4308 | supporter (noun): a person who backs a team or politician | loc: вболівальник
  EN TS: These supporters never stop singing.
  ua TS: Ці вболівальники ніколи не перестають співати.
  EN FS: These supporters never stop dancing.
  ua FS: Ці вболівальники ніколи не перестають танцювати.
  EN TP: singing supporters
  ua TP: вболівальники співають
  EN FP: sleeping supporters
  ua FP: вболівальники сплять
4309 | anthem (noun): a song of loyalty to a nation or school | loc: гімн
  EN TS: The anthem is making her cry.
  ua TS: Від гімну вона плаче.
  EN FS: The goal is making her cry.
  ua FS: Від голу вона плаче.
  EN TP: singing the anthem
  ua TP: співати гімн
  EN FP: writing the anthem
  ua FP: писати гімн
4310 | emotional (adjective): showing strong feelings openly | loc: емоційний
  EN TS: The emotional player is crying!
  ua TS: Емоційний гравець плаче!
  EN FS: The emotional player is laughing!
  ua FS: Емоційний гравець сміється!
  EN TP: an emotional team song
  ua TP: емоційна пісня команди
  EN FP: an emotional wedding song
  ua FP: емоційна весільна пісня
4311 | young (adjective): in an early period of life | loc: молодий
  EN TS: Even grandma plays with the young man.
  ua TS: Навіть бабуся грає з молодим хлопцем.
  EN FS: Even grandpa plays with the young man.
  ua FS: Навіть дідусь грає з молодим хлопцем.
  EN TP: a young basketball player
  ua TP: молодий баскетболіст
  EN FP: a young tennis player
  ua FP: молодий тенісист
4312 | loud (adjective): producing sound of great volume | loc: гучний
  EN TS: He is loud, but nobody hears.
  ua TS: Він гучний, але ніхто не чує.
  EN FS: He is quiet, but nobody hears.
  ua FS: Він тихий, але ніхто не чує.
  EN TP: a loud call
  ua TP: гучний поклик
  EN FP: a loud party
  ua FP: гучна вечірка
4313 | pub (noun): a building with a bar where people drink | loc: паб
  EN TS: The whole pub is singing!
  ua TS: Весь паб співає!
  EN FS: The whole pub is sleeping!
  ua FS: Весь паб спить!
  EN TP: karaoke in a pub
  ua TP: караоке в пабі
  EN FP: a pub quiz night
  ua FP: квіз у пабі
4314 | orange (noun): a round orange citrus fruit | loc: апельсин
  EN TS: Four oranges are in the bowl.
  ua TS: У мисці чотири апельсини.
  EN FS: Four apples are in the bowl.
  ua FS: У мисці чотири яблука.
  EN TP: a bowl of oranges
  ua TP: миска апельсинів
  EN FP: a glass of orange juice
  ua FP: склянка апельсинового соку
4315 | price (noun): the amount of money something is sold for | loc: ціна
  EN TS: The price keeps going up!
  ua TS: Ціна все росте!
  EN FS: The price keeps going down!
  ua FS: Ціна все падає!
  EN TP: the price of a flat
  ua TP: ціна квартири
  EN FP: the price of a car
  ua FP: ціна машини
4316 | sorry (adjective): feeling regret over something you did | loc: розкаяний
  EN TS: He is sorry. Tulips will help.
  ua TS: Він розкаяний. Тюльпани допоможуть.
  EN FS: He is sorry. Roses will help.
  ua FS: Він розкаяний. Троянди допоможуть.
  EN TP: sorry about the coffee
  ua TP: розкаяний через каву
  EN FP: sorry about the cake
  ua FP: розкаяний через торт
4317 | apologize (verb): to admit your faults and say sorry | loc: вибачитися
  EN TS: He is apologizing with coffee.
  ua TS: Він вибачається кавою.
  EN FS: He is apologizing with cake.
  ua FS: Він вибачається тортом.
  EN TP: apologizing for a spill
  ua TP: вибачатися за розлиту каву
  EN FP: apologizing for being late
  ua FP: вибачатися за запізнення
4318 | applause (noun): showing approval by clapping the hands | loc: оплески
  EN TS: His applause is growing.
  ua TS: Його оплески гучнішають.
  EN FS: His laughter is growing.
  ua FS: Його сміх гучнішає.
  EN TP: applause for the performer
  ua TP: оплески виконавцю
  EN FP: applause for the team
  ua FP: оплески команді
4319 | blend (verb): to combine things into one | loc: змішувати
  EN TS: The stripes are blending in.
  ua TS: Смужки змішуються.
  EN FS: The stripes are growing wider.
  ua FS: Смужки стають ширшими.
  EN TP: blending cream into skin
  ua TP: змішувати крем на шкірі
  EN FP: blending fruit in a mixer
  ua FP: змішувати фрукти в блендері
4320 | plan (noun): a scale drawing of a building | loc: план
  EN TS: He is drawing a plan.
  ua TS: Він малює план.
  EN FS: He is drawing a face.
  ua FS: Він малює обличчя.
  EN TP: drawing a house plan
  ua TP: малювати план будинку
  EN FP: making a holiday plan
  ua FP: складати план відпустки
4321 | model (noun): a representation of something, often smaller | loc: макет
  EN TS: She is fixing a city model.
  ua TS: Вона лагодить макет міста.
  EN FS: She is fixing a car model.
  ua FS: Вона лагодить макет машини.
  EN TP: a model of a city
  ua TP: макет міста
  EN FP: a model on a catwalk
  ua FP: модель на подіумі
4322 | dance (noun): an artistic form of moving to music | loc: танець
  EN TS: What a beautiful dance!
  ua TS: Який гарний танець!
  EN FS: What a beautiful car!
  ua FS: Яка гарна машина!
  EN TP: a tango dance
  ua TP: танець танго
  EN FP: a dance class
  ua FP: урок танців
4323 | lane (noun): a narrow way or road | loc: провулок
  EN TS: Nice dance moves in the lane!
  ua TS: Класні танцювальні рухи в провулку!
  EN FS: Nice bike tricks in the lane!
  ua FS: Класні трюки на велику в провулку!
  EN TP: a narrow painted lane
  ua TP: вузький розмальований провулок
  EN FP: a fast lane
  ua FP: швидка смуга
4324 | vast (adjective): unusually great in size or extent | loc: величезний
  EN TS: Vast glacier, tiny human.
  ua TS: Величезний льодовик, крихітна людина.
  EN FS: Vast glacier, tiny penguin.
  ua FS: Величезний льодовик, крихітний пінгвін.
  EN TP: a vast wall of ice
  ua TP: величезна стіна льоду
  EN FP: a vast crowd of people
  ua FP: величезний натовп людей
4325 | cattle (noun): cows and bulls as a group of farm animals | loc: худоба
  EN TS: Fact: the cattle are grazing.
  ua TS: Факт: худоба пасеться.
  EN FS: Fact: the horses are grazing.
  ua FS: Факт: коні пасуться.
  EN TP: cattle grazing on a plain
  ua TP: худоба пасеться на рівнині
  EN FP: cattle in a barn
  ua FP: худоба в хліві
4326 | wood (noun): the hard substance under the bark of trees | loc: деревина
  EN TS: The wood is burning.
  ua TS: Деревина горить.
  EN FS: The coal is burning.
  ua FS: Вугілля горить.
  EN TP: burning wood
  ua TP: деревина, що горить
  EN FP: cutting wood
  ua FP: рубати деревину
4327 | barbecue (noun): cooking meat outdoors on a hot grill | loc: барбекю
  EN TS: Everyone loves his barbecue!
  ua TS: Усі в захваті від його барбекю!
  EN FS: Everyone loves his salad!
  ua FS: Усі в захваті від його салату!
  EN TP: a sunset barbecue with friends
  ua TP: барбекю з друзями на заході
  EN FP: a barbecue in the rain
  ua FP: барбекю під дощем
4328 | rug (noun): a thick heavy fabric floor covering | loc: килим
  EN TS: The rug has a fringe.
  ua TS: У килима є бахрома.
  EN FS: The rug has a hole.
  ua FS: У килима є дірка.
  EN TP: a fringed rug
  ua TP: килим із бахромою
  EN FP: a rug on the wall
  ua FP: килим на стіні
4329 | furniture (noun): the furnishings that make a room ready to use | loc: меблі
  EN TS: They are sitting on furniture.
  ua TS: Вони сидять на меблях.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the floor.
  ua FS: Вони сидять на підлозі.
  EN TP: sitting on soft furniture
  ua TP: сидіти на м'яких меблях
  EN FP: carrying the furniture
  ua FP: носити меблі
4330 | march (verb): to march in a procession | loc: марширувати
  EN TS: The soldiers are marching.
  ua TS: Солдати марширують.
  EN FS: The soldiers are dancing.
  ua FS: Солдати танцюють.
  EN TP: soldiers marching in step
  ua TP: солдати марширують у ногу
  EN FP: soldiers marching at night
  ua FP: солдати марширують уночі
4331 | march (noun): walking with regular steps in a procession | loc: марш
  EN TS: It is a very precise march.
  ua TS: Це дуже точний марш.
  EN FS: It is a very messy march.
  ua FS: Це дуже безладний марш.
  EN TP: a march down the street
  ua TP: марш вулицею
  EN FP: a march in the forest
  ua FP: марш у лісі
4332 | arrest (verb): to take someone into custody | loc: заарештувати
  EN TS: He is arresting a burglar with rubber chickens.
  ua TS: Він заарештовує грабіжника з гумовими курками.
  EN FS: He is arresting a burglar with gold watches.
  ua FS: Він заарештовує грабіжника із золотими годинниками.
  EN TP: arresting a burglar
  ua TP: заарештувати грабіжника
  EN FP: arresting a police officer
  ua FP: заарештувати поліцейського
4333 | platform (noun): a raised flat surface | loc: платформа
  EN TS: She stepped onto the platform.
  ua TS: Вона ступила на платформу.
  EN FS: She stepped onto the bus.
  ua FS: Вона ступила в автобус.
  EN TP: a busy station platform
  ua TP: людна платформа вокзалу
  EN FP: a diving platform
  ua FP: платформа для стрибків у воду
4334 | studio (noun): a workplace for practising or teaching an art | loc: студія
  EN TS: She is painting in her studio.
  ua TS: Вона малює у своїй студії.
  EN FS: She is dancing in her studio.
  ua FS: Вона танцює у своїй студії.
  EN TP: a painter's busy studio
  ua TP: жвава студія художника
  EN FP: a recording studio
  ua FP: студія звукозапису
4335 | ask (verb): to inquire about something | loc: запитувати
  EN TS: The whole hall wants to ask!
  ua TS: Уся зала хоче запитати!
  EN FS: The whole hall wants to leave!
  ua FS: Уся зала хоче піти!
  EN TP: asking a question
  ua TP: запитувати лектора
  EN FP: asking for money
  ua FP: просити грошей
4336 | instructions (noun): a manual explaining how to use a device | loc: інструкція
  EN TS: He's reading the instructions, she's building.
  ua TS: Він читає інструкцію, а вона збирає.
  EN FS: He's reading the newspaper, she's building.
  ua FS: Він читає газету, а вона збирає.
  EN TP: reading the instructions
  ua TP: читати інструкцію
  EN FP: ignoring the instructions
  ua FP: ігнорувати інструкцію
4337 | phone (verb): to get in touch with someone by telephone | loc: телефонувати
  EN TS: She is phoning and running!
  ua TS: Вона телефонує й біжить!
  EN FS: She is phoning and dancing!
  ua FS: Вона телефонує й танцює!
  EN TP: phoning while running
  ua TP: телефонувати на бігу
  EN FP: phoning while driving
  ua FP: телефонувати за кермом
4338 | cash (noun): money in the form of bills or coins | loc: готівка
  EN TS: The ATM is spitting out cash.
  ua TS: Банкомат випльовує готівку.
  EN FS: The ATM is spitting out cards.
  ua FS: Банкомат випльовує картки.
  EN TP: cash flying out
  ua TP: готівка вилітає
  EN FP: cash in a wallet
  ua FP: готівка в гаманці
4339 | bank (noun): a financial institution that keeps and lends money | loc: банк
  EN TS: Her bank card works!
  ua TS: Картка її банку працює!
  EN FS: Her bank card is broken!
  ua FS: Картка її банку зламана!
  EN TP: a row of bank machines
  ua TP: ряд банкоматів
  EN FP: a bank by the river
  ua FP: банк біля річки
4340 | chips (noun): strips of potato fried in deep fat | loc: картопля фрі
  EN TS: The gulls want his chips!
  ua TS: Чайки хочуть його картоплю фрі!
  EN FS: The dogs want his chips!
  ua FS: Собаки хочуть його картоплю фрі!
  EN TP: shielding his chips from gulls
  ua TP: ховати картоплю фрі від чайок
  EN FP: sharing chips with friends
  ua FP: ділитися картоплею фрі з друзями
4341 | flee (verb): to run away quickly | loc: тікати
  EN TS: He is fleeing from the gulls!
  ua TS: Він тікає від чайок!
  EN FS: He is fleeing from the dogs!
  ua FS: Він тікає від собак!
  EN TP: fleeing from the gulls
  ua TP: тікати від чайок
  EN FP: fleeing from a storm
  ua FP: тікати від бурі
4342 | haul (verb): to pull something slowly and heavily | loc: тягти
  EN TS: She is hauling a heavy trunk.
  ua TS: Вона тягне важку скриню.
  EN FS: She is hauling a heavy chair.
  ua FS: Вона тягне важкий стілець.
  EN TP: hauling a heavy trunk
  ua TP: тягти важку скриню
  EN FP: hauling a fishing net
  ua FP: тягти рибальську сітку
4343 | laughter (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: сміх
  EN TS: Laughter everywhere!
  ua TS: Усюди сміх!
  EN FS: Tears everywhere!
  ua FS: Усюди сльози!
  EN TP: laughter in a playroom
  ua TP: сміх в ігровій кімнаті
  EN FP: laughter in a cinema
  ua FP: сміх у кінотеатрі
4344 | affection (noun): a warm feeling of liking someone | loc: прихильність
  EN TS: Flour, pastries and affection.
  ua TS: Борошно, випічка і прихильність.
  EN FS: Flour, pizza and affection.
  ua FS: Борошно, піца і прихильність.
  EN TP: affection in the kitchen
  ua TP: прихильність на кухні
  EN FP: affection for a pet
  ua FP: прихильність до улюбленця
4345 | joy (noun): the emotion of great happiness | loc: радість
  EN TS: Gifts, cake, pure joy!
  ua TS: Подарунки, торт, чиста радість!
  EN FS: Gifts, pizza, pure joy!
  ua FS: Подарунки, піца, чиста радість!
  EN TP: joy at a birthday party
  ua TP: радість на дні народження
  EN FP: joy at a wedding party
  ua FP: радість на весіллі
4346 | hop (verb): to jump lightly | loc: стрибати
  EN TS: Yo, kangaroos are hopping by.
  ua TS: Йо, повз стрибають кенгуру.
  EN FS: Yo, rabbits are hopping by.
  ua FS: Йо, повз стрибають кролики.
  EN TP: kangaroos hopping past
  ua TP: кенгуру стрибають повз
  EN FP: hopping on one foot
  ua FP: стрибати на одній нозі
4347 | ferry (verb): to transport people from one place to another | loc: перевозити
  EN TS: A boat is ferrying her across.
  ua TS: Човен перевозить її на інший берег.
  EN FS: A bus is ferrying her across.
  ua FS: Автобус перевозить її на інший берег.
  EN TP: to ferry people across
  ua TP: перевозити людей через річку
  EN FP: to ferry goods upriver
  ua FP: перевозити вантаж угору річкою
4348 | athletic (adjective): relating to athletes or sport | loc: атлетичний
  EN TS: She looks so athletic!
  ua TS: Вона така атлетична!
  EN FS: He looks so athletic!
  ua FS: Він такий атлетичний!
  EN TP: an athletic surfer
  ua TP: атлетична серфінгістка
  EN FP: an athletic club meeting
  ua FP: збори атлетичного клубу
4349 | guard (noun): a person who keeps watch over something | loc: охоронець
  EN TS: This guard can really surf.
  ua TS: Цей охоронець реально вміє серфити.
  EN FS: This guard can really ski.
  ua FS: Цей охоронець реально вміє кататися на лижах.
  EN TP: a guard on a surfboard
  ua TP: охоронець на дошці для серфу
  EN FP: a guard on a horse
  ua FP: охоронець на коні
4350 | bell (noun): a hollow metal device that rings when struck | loc: дзвін
  EN TS: Each cow has a big bell.
  ua TS: У кожної корови великий дзвін.
  EN FS: Each cow has a big horn.
  ua FS: У кожної корови великий ріг.
  EN TP: a bell on a cow
  ua TP: дзвін на корові
  EN FP: a bell on a church
  ua FP: дзвін на церкві
4351 | marble (noun): a hard rock that takes a high polish | loc: мармур
  EN TS: She is leaning on the marble.
  ua TS: Вона спирається на мармур.
  EN FS: She is leaning on the piano.
  ua FS: Вона спирається на піаніно.
  EN TP: a polished marble railing
  ua TP: поруччя з полірованого мармуру
  EN FP: a marble garden statue
  ua FP: мармурова садова статуя
4352 | turn (noun): the act of changing direction | loc: поворот
  EN TS: She is making a sharp turn.
  ua TS: Вона робить різкий поворот.
  EN FS: She is making a sharp jump.
  ua FS: Вона робить різкий стрибок.
  EN TP: a sharp turn on skis
  ua TP: різкий поворот на лижах
  EN FP: a wrong turn on skis
  ua FP: неправильний поворот на лижах
4353 | dessert (noun): a sweet dish served at the end of a meal | loc: десерт
  EN TS: Great dessert, chef.
  ua TS: Чудовий десерт, шефе.
  EN FS: Great salad, chef.
  ua FS: Чудовий салат, шефе.
  EN TP: a chocolate cake dessert
  ua TP: десерт — шоколадний торт
  EN FP: a dessert of fresh fruit
  ua FP: десерт зі свіжих фруктів
4354 | kick (noun): a blow with the foot | loc: удар ногою
  EN TS: Her kick sent leaves flying.
  ua TS: Від її удару ногою злетіло листя.
  EN FS: Her kick sent acorns flying.
  ua FS: Від її удару ногою злетіли жолуді.
  EN TP: a kick in the leaves
  ua TP: удар ногою по листю
  EN FP: a kick at a football
  ua FP: удар ногою по м'ячу
4355 | adorable (adjective): lovable in a sweet, childlike way | loc: чарівний
  EN TS: An adorable baby is kicking its feet.
  ua TS: Чарівне немовля дригає ніжками.
  EN FS: An adorable puppy is kicking its feet.
  ua FS: Чарівне цуценя дригає ніжками.
  EN TP: an adorable smiling baby
  ua TP: чарівне усміхнене немовля
  EN FP: an adorable sleeping kitten
  ua FP: чарівне сонне кошеня
4356 | sore (adjective): painful, hurting | loc: хворий
  EN TS: Sore back? Still a piggyback!
  ua TS: Хвора спина? Все одно на закорках!
  EN FS: Sore neck? Still a piggyback!
  ua FS: Хвора шия? Все одно на закорках!
  EN TP: rubbing a sore back
  ua TP: розтирати хвору спину
  EN FP: a sore throat in bed
  ua FP: хворе горло в ліжку
4357 | canvas (noun): a heavy woven fabric used for sails or tents | loc: брезент
  EN TS: Her canvas rucksack could hold a sofa.
  ua TS: Її рюкзак із брезенту вмістить диван.
  EN FS: Her leather rucksack could hold a sofa.
  ua FS: Її рюкзак зі шкіри вмістить диван.
  EN TP: a big canvas rucksack
  ua TP: великий рюкзак із брезенту
  EN FP: a canvas for painting
  ua FP: полотно для малювання
4358 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: важкий
  EN TS: That bag looks a bit heavy.
  ua TS: Ця сумка, здається, трохи важка.
  EN FS: That bike looks a bit heavy.
  ua FS: Цей велосипед, здається, трохи важкий.
  EN TP: a heavy rucksack
  ua TP: важкий рюкзак
  EN FP: heavy rain
  ua FP: сильний дощ
4359 | can (noun): a sealed metal container for food or drink | loc: бляшанка
  EN TS: The cans are falling out.
  ua TS: Бляшанки випадають.
  EN FS: The eggs are falling out.
  ua FS: Яйця випадають.
  EN TP: cans falling from a bag
  ua TP: бляшанки падають із пакета
  EN FP: a can of paint
  ua FP: бляшанка фарби
4360 | purse (noun): a container for carrying money and small items | loc: сумочка
  EN TS: She bought more than a purse.
  ua TS: Вона купила не лише сумочку.
  EN FS: She sold more than a purse.
  ua FS: Вона продала не лише сумочку.
  EN TP: showing off a new purse
  ua TP: хизуватися новою сумочкою
  EN FP: losing her purse
  ua FP: загубити сумочку
4361 | shop (verb): to do your shopping | loc: робити покупки
  EN TS: She is shopping like a pro.
  ua TS: Вона робить покупки як профі.
  EN FS: He is shopping like a pro.
  ua FS: Він робить покупки як профі.
  EN TP: shopping with many bags
  ua TP: робити покупки з купою пакетів
  EN FP: shopping for food
  ua FP: робити покупки в продуктовому
4362 | belt (noun): a loop of flexible material running between wheels | loc: конвеєрна стрічка
  EN TS: A suitcase is on the belt.
  ua TS: Валіза на конвеєрній стрічці.
  EN FS: A suitcase is on the bus.
  ua FS: Валіза в автобусі.
  EN TP: a moving luggage belt
  ua TP: рухома конвеєрна стрічка
  EN FP: a leather belt
  ua FP: шкіряний ремінь
4363 | appear (verb): to come into sight | loc: з’явитися
  EN TS: His backpack finally appeared!
  ua TS: Його рюкзак нарешті з’явився!
  EN FS: His suitcase finally appeared!
  ua FS: Його валіза нарешті з’явилася!
  EN TP: appearing on the belt
  ua TP: з’являтися на стрічці
  EN FP: appearing on television
  ua FP: з’являтися на телебаченні
4364 | dough (noun): a flour mixture you can knead or roll | loc: тісто
  EN TS: Dough in, croissants out!
  ua TS: Тісто всередину, круасани назовні!
  EN FS: Dough in, pizzas out!
  ua FS: Тісто всередину, піци назовні!
  EN TP: balls of raw dough
  ua TP: кульки сирого тіста
  EN FP: dough for a pizza base
  ua FP: тісто для основи піци
4365 | fresh (adjective): recently made, produced or picked | loc: свіжий
  EN TS: So much fresh bread!
  ua TS: Скільки свіжого хліба!
  EN FS: So much fresh fish!
  ua FS: Скільки свіжої риби!
  EN TP: fresh bread from the oven
  ua TP: свіжий хліб із печі
  EN FP: fresh fish from the sea
  ua FP: свіжа риба з моря
4366 | job (noun): the main activity you do to earn money | loc: робота
  EN TS: He loves his job.
  ua TS: Він любить свою роботу.
  EN FS: He hates his job.
  ua FS: Він ненавидить свою роботу.
  EN TP: a job in a bakery
  ua TP: робота в пекарні
  EN FP: a job in a bank
  ua FP: робота в банку
4367 | dry (verb): to remove the moisture and make dry | loc: сушити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Sheets are drying in the wind.
  ua TS: Простирадла сушаться на вітрі.
  EN FS: Sheets are drying on a boat.
  ua FS: Простирадла сушаться на човні.
  EN TP: sheets drying in the wind
  ua TP: простирадла сушаться на вітрі
  EN FP: dishes drying on a rack
  ua FP: посуд сушиться на сушарці
4368 | light (verb): to make something lighter or brighter | loc: освітлювати | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc освітлювати means illuminate; used запалювати (switch on/light)
  EN TS: She is lighting the bulbs.
  ua TS: Вона запалює лампочки.
  EN FS: She is lighting the candles.
  ua FS: Вона запалює свічки.
  EN TP: lighting a string of bulbs
  ua TP: запалювати гірлянду лампочок
  EN FP: lighting a candle
  ua FP: запалювати свічку
4369 | tape (noun): a long thin strip of cloth or paper for fastening | loc: стрічка
  EN TS: Too much tape? Maybe a little.
  ua TS: Забагато стрічки? Хіба трішки.
  EN FS: Too much glue? Maybe a little.
  ua FS: Забагато клею? Хіба трішки.
  EN TP: wrapped in white tape
  ua TP: обмотаний білою стрічкою
  EN FP: tape on a cardboard box
  ua FP: стрічка на картонній коробці
4370 | safe (noun): a strongbox where valuables are kept | loc: сейф
  EN TS: The big safe is open.
  ua TS: Великий сейф відчинений.
  EN FS: The big safe is closed.
  ua FS: Великий сейф зачинений.
  EN TP: an open bank safe
  ua TP: відчинений банківський сейф
  EN FP: a safe place to hide
  ua FP: безпечне місце для схованки
4371 | lobby (noun): a large entrance or reception area | loc: вестибюль
  EN TS: The bank lobby is huge.
  ua TS: Вестибюль банку величезний.
  EN FS: The bank lobby is tiny.
  ua FS: Вестибюль банку крихітний.
  EN TP: a marble bank lobby
  ua TP: мармуровий вестибюль банку
  EN FP: a busy hotel lobby
  ua FP: людний вестибюль готелю
4373 | gather (verb): to get together, assemble | loc: зібратися
  EN TS: The squad gathered on a roof.
  ua TS: Уся банда зібралася на даху.
  EN FS: The squad gathered on a boat.
  ua FS: Уся банда зібралася на човні.
  EN TP: friends gathering on a roof
  ua TP: друзі збираються на даху
  EN FP: gathering wood for a fire
  ua FP: збирати дрова для вогнища
4374 | electric (adjective): using or producing electricity | loc: електричний
  EN TS: The barber uses electric clippers.
  ua TS: Барбер користується електричною машинкою.
  EN FS: The barber uses an electric fan.
  ua FS: Барбер користується електричним вентилятором.
  EN TP: an electric hair clipper
  ua TP: електрична машинка для стрижки
  EN FP: an electric guitar
  ua FP: електрична гітара
4375 | rough (adjective): having an irregular, uneven surface | loc: шорсткий
  EN TS: The bark is rough and cracked.
  ua TS: Кора шорстка й потріскана.
  EN FS: The bark is smooth and clean.
  ua FS: Кора гладка й чиста.
  EN TP: rough tree bark
  ua TP: шорстка кора дерева
  EN FP: rough sea waves
  ua FP: бурхливі морські хвилі
4376 | noise (noun): sound of any kind, often unpleasant | loc: шум
  EN TS: The smallest dog is making the biggest noise!
  ua TS: Найменший пес здіймає найбільший шум!
  EN FS: The smallest cat is making the biggest noise!
  ua FS: Найменший кіт здіймає найбільший шум!
  EN TP: a lot of noise
  ua TP: багато шуму
  EN FP: a lot of music
  ua FP: багато музики
4377 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: підвал
  EN TS: The basement has a cinema!
  ua TS: У підвалі є кінотеатр!
  EN FS: The basement has a pool!
  ua FS: У підвалі є басейн!
  EN TP: a basement home cinema
  ua TP: домашній кінотеатр у підвалі
  EN FP: a basement full of water
  ua FP: підвал, повний води
4378 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: душ
  EN TS: Two showers in one bathroom? Wow!
  ua TS: Два душі в одній ванній? Вау!
  EN FS: Two toilets in one bathroom? Wow!
  ua FS: Два унітази в одній ванній? Вау!
  EN TP: a shower on the wall
  ua TP: душ на стіні
  EN FP: a shower in the garden
  ua FP: душ у саду
4379 | tub (noun): a large open container you fill with water to wash | loc: ванна
  EN TS: The tub is foaming over!
  ua TS: Ванна переливається піною!
  EN FS: The sink is foaming over!
  ua FS: Раковина переливається піною!
  EN TP: scrubbing the tub
  ua TP: відтирати ванну
  EN FP: a tub of ice cream
  ua FP: відерце морозива
4380 | fill (verb): to make something full | loc: наповнити
  EN TS: She is filling the bath.
  ua TS: Вона наповнює ванну.
  EN FS: She is filling the sink.
  ua FS: Вона наповнює раковину.
  EN TP: filling a bath with foam
  ua TP: наповнювати ванну піною
  EN FP: filling a glass with water
  ua FP: наповнювати склянку водою
4381 | warm (adjective): having a comfortable degree of heat | loc: теплий
  EN TS: A warm day at the beach.
  ua TS: Теплий день на пляжі.
  EN FS: A cold day at the beach.
  ua FS: Холодний день на пляжі.
  EN TP: a warm sunny beach
  ua TP: теплий сонячний пляж
  EN FP: a warm winter coat
  ua FP: тепле зимове пальто
4382 | salmon (noun): a large food fish of northern waters | loc: лосось
  EN TS: The bear is grabbing a salmon.
  ua TS: Ведмідь хапає лосося.
  EN FS: The bear is grabbing a bird.
  ua FS: Ведмідь хапає птаха.
  EN TP: a leaping salmon
  ua TP: лосось у стрибку
  EN FP: a salmon on a plate
  ua FP: лосось на тарілці
4383 | thick (adjective): not thin, wide from one surface to the other | loc: товстий
  EN TS: What a thick beard!
  ua TS: Ого, яка товста борода!
  EN FS: What a thin beard!
  ua FS: Ого, яка тонка борода!
  EN TP: a thick black beard
  ua TP: товста чорна борода
  EN FP: a thick winter coat
  ua FP: товсте зимове пальто
4384 | bounce (verb): to spring back after hitting something | loc: відскочити
  EN TS: She bounced off her bed!
  ua TS: Вона відскочила від ліжка!
  EN FS: She bounced off the sofa!
  ua FS: Вона відскочила від дивана!
  EN TP: bouncing on the bed
  ua TP: відскакувати від ліжка
  EN FP: bouncing a ball
  ua FP: відбивати м'яч
4385 | cost (verb): to be priced at a certain amount | loc: коштувати
  EN TS: The big bed costs 20,000 euros. "Cheap."
  ua TS: Велике ліжко коштує 20 000 євро. «Дешево».
  EN FS: The big bed costs 200 euros. "Cheap."
  ua FS: Велике ліжко коштує 200 євро. «Дешево».
  EN TP: costing 20,000 euros
  ua TP: коштувати 20 000 євро
  EN FP: costing 50 cents
  ua FP: коштувати 50 центів
4386 | poster (noun): a sign put up in a public place as an advert | loc: плакат
  EN TS: Posters cover his whole room.
  ua TS: Плакати вкривають усю його кімнату.
  EN FS: Maps cover his whole room.
  ua FS: Мапи вкривають усю його кімнату.
  EN TP: walls covered in posters
  ua TP: стіни в плакатах
  EN FP: posters on the fridge
  ua FP: плакати на холодильнику
4387 | compare (verb): to examine how things are similar or different | loc: порівнювати
  EN TS: We compare three bedrooms.
  ua TS: Ми порівнюємо три спальні.
  EN FS: We compare three kitchens.
  ua FS: Ми порівнюємо три кухні.
  EN TP: comparing three bedrooms
  ua TP: порівнювати три спальні
  EN FP: comparing three kitchens
  ua FP: порівнювати три кухні
4388 | daisy (noun): a plant with flower heads of white ray petals | loc: маргаритка
  EN TS: A bee is pollinating daisies.
  ua TS: Бджола запилює маргаритки.
  EN FS: A bird is pollinating daisies.
  ua FS: Пташка запилює маргаритки.
  EN TP: a bee over the daisies
  ua TP: бджола над маргаритками
  EN FP: a daisy chain necklace
  ua FP: намисто з маргариток
4389 | start (verb): to take the first step in doing something | loc: починати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He missed the start. Oops.
  ua TS: Він проґавив, коли почали. Упс.
  EN FS: He missed the bus. Oops.
  ua FS: Він проґавив автобус. Упс.
  EN TP: missing the start
  ua TP: проґавити, коли почали
  EN FP: starting a car
  ua FP: заводити машину
4390 | excitement (noun): the feeling of lively, cheerful joy | loc: захоплення
  EN TS: The excitement is real!
  ua TS: Захоплення зашкалює!
  EN FS: The boredom is real!
  ua FS: Нудьга зашкалює!
  EN TP: excitement before a concert
  ua TP: захоплення перед концертом
  EN FP: excitement before an exam
  ua FP: захоплення перед іспитом
4391 | alone (adverb): without any others with you | loc: сам
  EN TS: Alone with a whole pizza? Yes!
  ua TS: Сам на сам із цілою піцою? Так!
  EN FS: Alone with a whole cake? Yes!
  ua FS: Сам на сам із цілим тортом? Так!
  EN TP: home alone with pizza
  ua TP: сам удома з піцою
  EN FP: alone in a restaurant
  ua FP: сам у ресторані
4392 | fall (noun): a sudden drop from standing up | loc: падіння
  EN TS: What a fall in the park!
  ua TS: Оце падіння в парку!
  EN FS: What a fall in the kitchen!
  ua FS: Оце падіння на кухні!
  EN TP: a fall over a bench
  ua TP: падіння через лавку
  EN FP: a fall from a ladder
  ua FP: падіння з драбини
4393 | chat (verb): to talk in a friendly, relaxed way | loc: балакати
  EN TS: The old guys are chatting.
  ua TS: Старі діди балакають.
  EN FS: The old guys are fighting.
  ua FS: Старі діди б’ються.
  EN TP: chatting on a bench
  ua TP: балакати на лавці
  EN FP: chatting on the phone
  ua FP: балакати по телефону
4394 | bend (verb): to form a curve | loc: згинати
  EN TS: She is bending everything!
  ua TS: Вона все згинає!
  EN FS: She is breaking everything!
  ua FS: Вона все ламає!
  EN TP: bending a tree branch
  ua TP: згинати гілку дерева
  EN FP: bending a spoon
  ua FP: згинати ложку
4395 | opponent (noun): a contestant you are matched against | loc: суперник
  EN TS: She is attacking her opponent.
  ua TS: Вона атакує свого суперника.
  EN FS: She is hugging her opponent.
  ua FS: Вона обіймає свого суперника.
  EN TP: a sneaky opponent
  ua TP: підступний суперник
  EN FP: an opponent in the ring
  ua FP: суперник на рингу
4396 | shock (verb): to surprise someone greatly | loc: шокувати
  EN TS: Her move totally shocked him!
  ua TS: Її хід його просто шокував!
  EN FS: Her move totally bored him!
  ua FS: Її хід його просто приспав!
  EN TP: shocked by her move
  ua TP: шокований її ходом
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  ua FP: шокований ціною
4397 | bike (verb): to ride a bicycle | loc: їздити на велосипеді
  EN TS: He is biking in Amsterdam.
  ua TS: Він їздить на велосипеді Амстердамом.
  EN FS: He is biking in the forest.
  ua FS: Він їздить на велосипеді лісом.
  EN TP: to bike along a canal
  ua TP: їздити на велосипеді вздовж каналу
  EN FP: to bike along a beach
  ua FP: їздити на велосипеді вздовж пляжу
4398 | advertisement (noun): a public promotion of a product or service | loc: реклама
  EN TS: Advertisements are everywhere!
  ua TS: Реклама всюди!
  EN FS: Trees are everywhere!
  ua FS: Дерева всюди!
  EN TP: huge lit advertisements
  ua TP: величезна світна реклама
  EN FP: advertisements in a paper
  ua FP: реклама в газеті
4399 | dream (verb): to have a daydream or fantasy | loc: мріяти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is dreaming of a burger.
  ua TS: Вона мріє про бургер.
  EN FS: She is dreaming of a pizza.
  ua FS: Вона мріє про піцу.
  EN TP: dreaming of a big house
  ua TP: мріяти про великий будинок
  EN FP: dreaming at night in bed
  ua FP: мріяти вночі в ліжку
4400 | spot (verb): to catch sight of something | loc: помітити
  EN TS: She spotted birds at sea.
  ua TS: Вона помітила птахів у морі.
  EN FS: She spotted ships at sea.
  ua FS: Вона помітила кораблі в морі.
  EN TP: to spot birds far away
  ua TP: помітити птахів удалині
  EN FP: to spot a mistake
  ua FP: помітити помилку
4401 | far (adjective): at a great distance | loc: далекий
  EN TS: She is looking at the far shore.
  ua TS: Вона дивиться на далекий берег.
  EN FS: She is looking at the far city.
  ua FS: Вона дивиться на далеке місто.
  EN TP: the far lake shore
  ua TP: далекий берег озера
  EN FP: a far country
  ua FP: далека країна
4402 | appetite (noun): a feeling of craving food or something else | loc: апетит
  EN TS: Apple, burger, melon: big appetite!
  ua TS: Яблуко, бургер, диня: апетит що треба!
  EN FS: Apple, pizza, melon: big appetite!
  ua FS: Яблуко, піца, диня: апетит що треба!
  EN TP: a huge picnic appetite
  ua TP: величезний апетит на пікніку
  EN FP: no appetite at all
  ua FP: жодного апетиту
4403 | layer (noun): a single thickness of some material | loc: шар
  EN TS: Just one more layer.
  ua TS: Ще тільки один шар.
  EN FS: Just one more pillow.
  ua FS: Ще тільки одна подушка.
  EN TP: layer after layer of blankets
  ua TP: шар за шаром ковдр
  EN FP: a layer of fresh snow
  ua FP: шар свіжого снігу
4404 | injury (noun): physical damage to the body from an accident | loc: травма
  EN TS: He has a finger injury.
  ua TS: У нього травма пальця.
  EN FS: He has a knee injury.
  ua FS: У нього травма коліна.
  EN TP: a finger injury
  ua TP: травма пальця
  EN FP: a sports injury
  ua FP: спортивна травма
4405 | help (noun): the activity of doing something for someone's need | loc: допомога
  EN TS: His friend is a big help.
  ua TS: Друг для нього — велика допомога.
  EN FS: His dog is a big help.
  ua FS: Пес для нього — велика допомога.
  EN TP: help from a friend
  ua TP: допомога від друга
  EN FP: help with homework
  ua FP: допомога з домашкою
4406 | smooth (verb): to make something smooth, as if by rubbing | loc: розгладжувати
  EN TS: The artist is smoothing lines.
  ua TS: Художник розгладжує лінії.
  EN FS: The artist is drawing lines.
  ua FS: Художник малює лінії.
  EN TP: smoothing harsh lines
  ua TP: розгладжувати різкі лінії
  EN FP: smoothing a bed sheet
  ua FP: розгладжувати простирадло
4407 | healthy (adjective): having good health in body or mind | loc: здоровий
  EN TS: Spinach keeps him healthy.
  ua TS: Шпинат тримає його здоровим.
  EN FS: Chocolate keeps him healthy.
  ua FS: Шоколад тримає його здоровим.
  EN TP: a healthy young man
  ua TP: здоровий молодий чоловік
  EN FP: a healthy bank account
  ua FP: здоровий банківський рахунок
4408 | taste (noun): the sensation you get from food on your tongue | loc: смак
  EN TS: Smoothie taste: perfect!
  ua TS: Смак смузі: ідеал!
  EN FS: Coffee taste: perfect!
  ua FS: Смак кави: ідеал!
  EN TP: the taste of a smoothie
  ua TP: смак смузі
  EN FP: a good taste in music
  ua FP: гарний смак у музиці
4409 | blind (adjective): unable to see | loc: сліпий
  EN TS: The whole party is blind!
  ua TS: Уся вечірка сліпа!
  EN FS: The whole party is asleep!
  ua FS: Уся вечірка сонна!
  EN TP: blind for a party game
  ua TP: сліпий на час гри
  EN FP: a blind date
  ua FP: побачення наосліп
4410 | contest (noun): an event where a winner is chosen from contestants | loc: змагання
  EN TS: Staring contest! Don't blink!
  ua TS: Змагання в переглядки! Не кліпай!
  EN FS: Eating contest! Don't blink!
  ua FS: Змагання з поїдання! Не кліпай!
  EN TP: a staring contest
  ua TP: змагання в переглядки
  EN FP: a singing contest
  ua FP: змагання зі співу
4411 | treatment (noun): medical care given to help someone get better | loc: лікування
  EN TS: The treatment is a plaster.
  ua TS: Лікування — пластир.
  EN FS: The treatment is an injection.
  ua FS: Лікування — укол.
  EN TP: treatment for a blister
  ua TP: лікування мозоля
  EN FP: treatment for a headache
  ua FP: лікування головного болю
4412 | block (verb): to make a way unsuitable for passage | loc: заблокувати
  EN TS: Sheep are blocking the road!
  ua TS: Вівці заблокували дорогу!
  EN FS: Cows are blocking the road!
  ua FS: Корови заблокували дорогу!
  EN TP: blocking a mountain road
  ua TP: заблокувати гірську дорогу
  EN FP: blocking a phone number
  ua FP: заблокувати номер телефону
4413 | smell (noun): the sensation you get from odors in the nose | loc: запах
  EN TS: She loves the smell.
  ua TS: Вона обожнює цей запах.
  EN FS: She hates the smell.
  ua FS: Вона ненавидить цей запах.
  EN TP: the smell of blossoms
  ua TP: запах цвіту
  EN FP: the smell of coffee
  ua FP: запах кави
4414 | struggle (noun): an energetic attempt to achieve something | loc: боротьба
  EN TS: Going uphill is a real struggle.
  ua TS: Їхати вгору — справжня боротьба.
  EN FS: Going downhill is a real struggle.
  ua FS: Їхати вниз — справжня боротьба.
  EN TP: a struggle against the wind
  ua TP: боротьба з вітром
  EN FP: a struggle with homework
  ua FP: боротьба з домашкою
4415 | compliment (noun): a remark expressing praise or admiration | loc: комплімент
  EN TS: Stop it! Too many compliments!
  ua TS: Годі! Забагато компліментів!
  EN FS: Stop it! Too many questions!
  ua FS: Годі! Забагато запитань!
  EN TP: blushing at a compliment
  ua TP: червоніти від компліменту
  EN FP: a compliment to the chef
  ua FP: комплімент шефу
4416 | ticket (noun): a document that lets you ride or enter somewhere | loc: квиток
  EN TS: Green light, ticket OK!
  ua TS: Зелене світло, квиток ок!
  EN FS: Green light, passport OK!
  ua FS: Зелене світло, паспорт ок!
  EN TP: scanning a ticket
  ua TP: сканувати квиток
  EN FP: buying a train ticket
  ua FP: купувати квиток на потяг
4417 | travel (noun): the act of going from one place to another | loc: подорож
  EN TS: Travel by tram, boat, plane.
  ua TS: Подорож трамваєм, човном, літаком.
  EN FS: Travel by bus, boat, plane.
  ua FS: Подорож автобусом, човном, літаком.
  EN TP: travel by boat
  ua TP: подорож човном
  EN FP: travel by car
  ua FP: подорож машиною
4418 | burst (verb): to come open suddenly from pressure inside | loc: лопнути | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc лопнути (pop) does not fit steam bursting out; used вирватися in TS/TP
  EN TS: Steam burst into her face.
  ua TS: Пара вирвалася їй в обличчя.
  EN FS: Water burst into her face.
  ua FS: Вода вирвалася їй в обличчя.
  EN TP: steam bursting from a pot
  ua TP: пара виривається з каструлі
  EN FP: a burst water pipe
  ua FP: лопнула водопровідна труба
4419 | row (verb): to move a boat with oars | loc: веслувати
  EN TS: She is rowing with her puppy.
  ua TS: Вона веслує зі своїм цуценям.
  EN FS: She is rowing with her kitten.
  ua FS: Вона веслує зі своїм кошеням.
  EN TP: rowing on a calm pond
  ua TP: веслувати тихим ставком
  EN FP: rowing on a wild sea
  ua FP: веслувати бурхливим морем
4420 | illustration (noun): artwork that helps make something clear | loc: ілюстрація
  EN TS: The illustration shows a bone.
  ua TS: Ілюстрація показує кістку.
  EN FS: The illustration shows a hand.
  ua FS: Ілюстрація показує руку.
  EN TP: an illustration of a bone
  ua TP: ілюстрація кістки
  EN FP: an illustration of a hand
  ua FP: ілюстрація руки
4421 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: кістка
  EN TS: She is holding a small bone.
  ua TS: Вона тримає маленьку кістку.
  EN FS: She is holding a small stone.
  ua FS: Вона тримає маленький камінь.
  EN TP: a long thigh bone
  ua TP: довга стегнова кістка
  EN FP: a dog's bone
  ua FP: собача кістка
4423 | barrier (noun): a structure that blocks free movement | loc: бар'єр
  EN TS: The barrier is up. Run!
  ua TS: Бар'єр піднято. Біжи!
  EN FS: The barrier is down. Run!
  ua FS: Бар'єр опущено. Біжи!
  EN TP: a raised barrier
  ua TP: піднятий бар'єр
  EN FP: a language barrier
  ua FP: мовний бар'єр
4424 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: кордон
  EN TS: The border is just a stripe.
  ua TS: Кордон — це просто смужка.
  EN FS: The border is just a fence.
  ua FS: Кордон — це просто паркан.
  EN TP: crossing the border on foot
  ua TP: перетинати кордон пішки
  EN FP: a border around a picture
  ua FP: рамка навколо картини
4425 | order (verb): to direct somebody to do something with authority | loc: наказати
  EN TS: The robot is ordering them around.
  ua TS: Робот усім наказує!
  EN FS: The robot is ordering a big pizza.
  ua FS: Робот замовляє велику піцу!
  EN TP: to order the team around
  ua TP: наказувати команді
  EN FP: to order a coffee
  ua FP: замовити каву
4426 | meeting (noun): a formally arranged gathering | loc: нарада
  EN TS: The meeting went well.
  ua TS: Нарада пройшла добре.
  EN FS: The meeting went badly.
  ua FS: Нарада пройшла погано.
  EN TP: a meeting in the office
  ua TP: нарада в офісі
  EN FP: a meeting in the park
  ua FP: нарада в парку
4427 | ceremony (noun): a formal event on a special occasion | loc: церемонія
  EN TS: They are bowing at a ceremony.
  ua TS: Вони кланяються на церемонії.
  EN FS: They are eating at a ceremony.
  ua FS: Вони їдять на церемонії.
  EN TP: a formal bowing ceremony
  ua TP: офіційна церемонія з поклонами
  EN FP: a wedding ceremony
  ua FP: весільна церемонія
4429 | restaurant (noun): a building where people go to eat | loc: ресторан
  EN TS: Ramen at a noodle restaurant!
  ua TS: Рамен у ресторані локшини!
  EN FS: Ramen at a burger restaurant!
  ua FS: Рамен у бургерному ресторані!
  EN TP: a noodle restaurant
  ua TP: ресторан локшини
  EN FP: a restaurant kitchen
  ua FP: кухня ресторану
4430 | kid (noun): a young person | loc: дитина
  EN TS: The kid is so happy!
  ua TS: Дитина така щаслива!
  EN FS: The kid is so sad!
  ua FS: Дитина така сумна!
  EN TP: a kid running fast
  ua TP: дитина швидко біжить
  EN FP: a kid sitting still
  ua FP: дитина сидить тихо
4431 | score (verb): to gain points in a game | loc: забивати
  EN TS: He scored, the dog wants a turn.
  ua TS: Він забив, а пес теж хоче спробувати.
  EN FS: He scored, the cat wants a turn.
  ua FS: Він забив, а кіт теж хоче спробувати.
  EN TP: scoring a goal
  ua TP: забивати гол
  EN FP: scoring a basket
  ua FP: закидати м'яч у кошик
4432 | ignore (verb): to refuse to notice or acknowledge | loc: ігнорувати
  EN TS: Everyone is ignoring him.
  ua TS: Усі його ігнорують.
  EN FS: Everyone is hugging him.
  ua FS: Усі його обіймають.
  EN TP: ignoring the salesman
  ua TP: ігнорувати продавця
  EN FP: ignoring a phone call
  ua FP: ігнорувати дзвінок
4433 | bunch (noun): a grouping of similar things | loc: пучок | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc пучок is wrong for flowers; used букет
  EN TS: She will love this bunch.
  ua TS: Їй сподобається цей букет.
  EN FS: She will love this cake.
  ua FS: Їй сподобається цей торт.
  EN TP: a bunch of roses
  ua TP: букет троянд
  EN FP: a bunch of keys
  ua FP: в'язка ключів
4434 | fair (noun): a traveling show with rides and games | loc: ярмарок
  EN TS: The fair is fun for two.
  ua TS: На ярмарку весело вдвох.
  EN FS: The zoo is fun for two.
  ua FS: У зоопарку весело вдвох.
  EN TP: a date at the fair
  ua TP: побачення на ярмарку
  EN FP: a fair price
  ua FP: справедлива ціна
4435 | exhibition (noun): a collection of things for public display | loc: виставка
  EN TS: Whoa, a brain exhibition!
  ua TS: Ого, виставка мозків!
  EN FS: Whoa, a car exhibition!
  ua FS: Ого, виставка авто!
  EN TP: a brain exhibition
  ua TP: виставка мозку
  EN FP: an art exhibition
  ua FP: художня виставка
4436 | cheer (noun): a shout of approval | loc: схвальний вигук
  EN TS: A kick like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  ua TS: Удар ногою як у Роналду — гучний схвальний вигук!
  EN FS: A header like Ronaldo gets a big cheer!
  ua FS: Удар головою як у Роналду — гучний схвальний вигук!
  EN TP: a cheer for the kick
  ua TP: схвальний вигук за удар
  EN FP: a cheer for the singer
  ua FP: схвальний вигук співакові
4438 | parade (noun): a ceremonial procession of people marching | loc: парад
  EN TS: She is leading the parade!
  ua TS: Вона очолює парад!
  EN FS: She is leading the marathon!
  ua FS: Вона очолює марафон!
  EN TP: a carnival parade
  ua TP: карнавальний парад
  EN FP: a military parade
  ua FP: військовий парад
4439 | festival (noun): a day or period set aside for celebration | loc: фестиваль
  EN TS: The festival is loud!
  ua TS: Фестиваль гучний!
  EN FS: The festival is quiet!
  ua FS: Фестиваль тихий!
  EN TP: a street festival
  ua TP: вуличний фестиваль
  EN FP: a film festival
  ua FP: кінофестиваль
4440 | strike (verb): to deliver a sharp blow with the hand or fist | loc: вдарити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is striking concrete!
  ua TS: Вона вдаряє по бетону!
  EN FS: She is striking glass!
  ua FS: Вона вдаряє по склу!
  EN TP: striking a stack of slabs
  ua TP: вдарити по стосу плит
  EN FP: striking a match
  ua FP: запалити сірник
4441 | breath (noun): the process of taking in and letting out air | loc: дихання
  EN TS: Wow, her breath makes clouds.
  ua TS: Ого, її дихання робить хмарки.
  EN FS: Wow, her breath makes bubbles.
  ua FS: Ого, її дихання робить бульбашки.
  EN TP: a cloud of warm breath
  ua TP: хмарка теплого дихання
  EN FP: a breath of fresh air
  ua FP: ковток свіжого повітря
4442 | shoe (noun): footwear shaped to fit the foot | loc: туфля
  EN TS: Her shoes are white.
  ua TS: Її туфлі білі.
  EN FS: Her shoes are red.
  ua FS: Її туфлі червоні.
  EN TP: plain white shoes
  ua TP: прості білі туфлі
  EN FP: white running shoes
  ua FP: білі кросівки
4443 | wedding (noun): the event at which a marriage ceremony happens | loc: весілля
  EN TS: The wedding is starting and everyone is turning around.
  ua TS: Весілля починається, і всі обертаються.
  EN FS: The wedding is ending and everyone is turning around.
  ua FS: Весілля закінчується, і всі обертаються.
  EN TP: walking down a wedding aisle
  ua TP: іти до вівтаря на весіллі
  EN FP: dancing at a wedding party
  ua FP: танцювати на весільній вечірці
4445 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: міст
  EN TS: Wow, this bridge is huge!
  ua TS: Ого, цей міст величезний!
  EN FS: Wow, this boat is huge!
  ua FS: Ого, цей човен величезний!
  EN TP: a red suspension bridge
  ua TP: червоний підвісний міст
  EN FP: a bridge over a road
  ua FP: міст над дорогою
4446 | glass (noun): a hard transparent solid that breaks easily | loc: скло
  EN TS: The pub has frosted glass.
  ua TS: У пабі матове скло.
  EN FS: The pub has broken glass.
  ua FS: У пабі розбите скло.
  EN TP: panels of frosted glass
  ua TP: панелі з матового скла
  EN FP: a glass of red wine
  ua FP: келих червоного вина
4447 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: мокрий
  EN TS: Just a little wet today.
  ua TS: Сьогодні все лише трохи мокре.
  EN FS: Just a little snowy today.
  ua FS: Сьогодні все лише трохи засніжене.
  EN TP: a wet bus stop
  ua TP: мокра зупинка
  EN FP: a wet dog
  ua FP: мокрий пес
4448 | handle (noun): the part of an object you hold to use or move it | loc: ручка
  EN TS: She is gripping the handle.
  ua TS: Вона стискає ручку.
  EN FS: She is gripping the ladder.
  ua FS: Вона стискає драбину.
  EN TP: a long blue handle
  ua TP: довга синя ручка
  EN FP: a door handle
  ua FP: дверна ручка
4450 | patch (noun): a small part that looks different from the rest | loc: латка
  EN TS: His dungarees have patches.
  ua TS: На його комбінезоні латки.
  EN FS: His boots have patches.
  ua FS: На його чоботях латки.
  EN TP: patches on the dungarees
  ua TP: латки на комбінезоні
  EN FP: a patch of grass
  ua FP: клаптик трави
4451 | teenager (noun): a juvenile, between puberty and maturity | loc: підліток
  EN TS: Two teenagers are gaming, so intense.
  ua TS: Два підлітки геймлять, усе серйозно.
  EN FS: Two teenagers are dancing, so intense.
  ua FS: Два підлітки танцюють, усе серйозно.
  EN TP: teenagers playing a game
  ua TP: підлітки грають у гру
  EN FP: teenagers playing football
  ua FP: підлітки грають у футбол
4452 | hurt (verb): to be the source of pain | loc: боліти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: That shin must really hurt!
  ua TS: Ця гомілка, мабуть, дуже болить!
  EN FS: That arm must really hurt!
  ua FS: Ця рука, мабуть, дуже болить!
  EN TP: a shin that hurts
  ua TP: гомілка, що болить
  EN FP: an arm that hurts
  ua FP: рука, що болить
4454 | tip (verb): to cause something to tilt | loc: перекидати
  EN TS: She is tipping the apples out.
  ua TS: Вона перекидає відро з яблуками.
  EN FS: She is tipping the eggs out.
  ua FS: Вона перекидає відро з яйцями.
  EN TP: tipping a bucket of apples
  ua TP: перекидати відро яблук
  EN FP: tipping the waiter
  ua FP: давати офіціанту чайові
4455 | site (noun): the piece of land where something is located | loc: ділянка
  EN TS: He is working on the site.
  ua TS: Він працює на ділянці.
  EN FS: He is sleeping on the site.
  ua FS: Він спить на ділянці.
  EN TP: a building site
  ua TP: будівельна ділянка
  EN FP: a camping site
  ua FP: ділянка для кемпінгу
4456 | modern (adjective): belonging to the present, modern era | loc: сучасний
  EN TS: The tower is very modern.
  ua TS: Вежа дуже сучасна.
  EN FS: The tower is very old.
  ua FS: Вежа дуже стара.
  EN TP: a modern glass tower
  ua TP: сучасна скляна вежа
  EN FP: a modern glass phone
  ua FP: сучасний скляний телефон
4457 | crouch (verb): to bend your knees down close to the ground | loc: присідати
  EN TS: She is crouching by the fire.
  ua TS: Вона присіла біля вогню.
  EN FS: She is crouching by the car.
  ua FS: Вона присіла біля машини.
  EN TP: crouching over a fire
  ua TP: присідати над вогнем
  EN FP: crouching behind a rock
  ua FP: присідати за каменем
4458 | disaster (noun): a state of extreme ruin and misfortune | loc: катастрофа
  EN TS: Total kitchen disaster!
  ua TS: Повна кухонна катастрофа!
  EN FS: Total garden disaster!
  ua FS: Повна садова катастрофа!
  EN TP: a smoky kitchen disaster
  ua TP: задимлена катастрофа на кухні
  EN FP: a natural disaster on TV
  ua FP: природна катастрофа по телевізору
4459 | burning (noun): the act of burning something | loc: спалювання
  EN TS: A little burning, no problem.
  ua TS: Трішки спалювання? Не проблема.
  EN FS: A little rain, no problem.
  ua FS: Трішки дощу? Не проблема.
  EN TP: the burning of a marshmallow
  ua TP: спалювання зефірки
  EN FP: the burning of old letters
  ua FP: спалювання старих листів
4460 | palm (noun): the inner surface of the hand | loc: долоня
  EN TS: She is warming her palms.
  ua TS: Вона гріє долоні.
  EN FS: She is warming her feet.
  ua FS: Вона гріє ноги.
  EN TP: palms out to the fire
  ua TP: долоні до вогню
  EN FP: palm trees on the beach
  ua FP: пальми на пляжі
4461 | dig (verb): to turn up or remove earth | loc: копати
  EN TS: They are digging. He can't escape.
  ua TS: Вони копають. Йому не втекти.
  EN FS: They are swimming. He can't escape.
  ua FS: Вони плавають. Йому не втекти.
  EN TP: digging in the sand
  ua TP: копати в піску
  EN FP: digging in the garden
  ua FP: копати в саду
4462 | funeral (noun): a ceremony where a dead person is buried | loc: похорон
  EN TS: A white rose at the funeral.
  ua TS: Біла троянда на похороні.
  EN FS: A red rose at the funeral.
  ua FS: Червона троянда на похороні.
  EN TP: a funeral in a cemetery
  ua TP: похорон на цвинтарі
  EN FP: a funeral in a church
  ua FP: похорон у церкві
4463 | welcome (verb): to greet someone on arrival | loc: вітати
  EN TS: The driver is welcoming them.
  ua TS: Водій вітає їх.
  EN FS: The pilot is welcoming them.
  ua FS: Пілот вітає їх.
  EN TP: welcoming people on a bus
  ua TP: вітати людей в автобусі
  EN FP: welcoming people on a plane
  ua FP: вітати людей у літаку
4464 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: читати
  EN TS: She is reading, not waiting.
  ua TS: Вона читає, а не чекає.
  EN FS: She is eating, not waiting.
  ua FS: Вона їсть, а не чекає.
  EN TP: reading at a bus stop
  ua TP: читати на зупинці
  EN FP: reading on the train
  ua FP: читати в потязі
4465 | upstairs (adverb): on a floor above | loc: нагорі
  EN TS: He went upstairs, best day ever!
  ua TS: Він сів нагорі, найкращий день!
  EN FS: He went downstairs, best day ever!
  ua FS: Він сів унизу, найкращий день!
  EN TP: upstairs on a bus
  ua TP: нагорі в автобусі
  EN FP: upstairs in a house
  ua FP: нагорі в будинку
4466 | aboard (adverb): on a ship, train, plane or other vehicle | loc: на борту
  EN TS: All aboard the tour bus!
  ua TS: Усі на борту туристичного автобуса!
  EN FS: All aboard the ferry!
  ua FS: Усі на борту порома!
  EN TP: aboard a city bus
  ua TP: на борту міського автобуса
  EN FP: aboard a cruise ship
  ua FP: на борту круїзного лайнера
4467 | ham (noun): meat from the thigh of a pig, usually smoked | loc: шинка
  EN TS: Hams are hanging on the wall.
  ua TS: На стіні висять шинки.
  EN FS: Hats are hanging on the wall.
  ua FS: На стіні висять капелюхи.
  EN TP: whole hams on hooks
  ua TP: цілі шинки на гаках
  EN FP: a ham sandwich
  ua FP: сендвіч із шинкою
4468 | porter (noun): a person employed to carry luggage | loc: носильник
  EN TS: The porter is carrying a lot.
  ua TS: Носильник несе чимало.
  EN FS: The porter is holding nothing.
  ua FS: Носильник нічого не тримає.
  EN TP: a heavily loaded porter
  ua TP: носильник, навантажений по вуха
  EN FP: a porter at a hotel
  ua FP: носильник у готелі
4469 | cabinet (noun): a piece of furniture with doors and shelves | loc: шафа
  EN TS: The cabinet is attacking him!
  ua TS: Шафа нападає на нього!
  EN FS: The fridge is attacking him!
  ua FS: Холодильник нападає на нього!
  EN TP: opening the kitchen cabinet
  ua TP: відчиняти кухонну шафу
  EN FP: locking the kitchen cabinet
  ua FP: замикати кухонну шафу
4470 | store (verb): to keep something for future use | loc: зберігати
  EN TS: Plates stored in colour order.
  ua TS: Тарілки зберігаються за кольорами.
  EN FS: Cups stored in colour order.
  ua FS: Чашки зберігаються за кольорами.
  EN TP: storing plates in a cupboard
  ua TP: зберігати тарілки в шафі
  EN FP: storing files on a laptop
  ua FP: зберігати файли на ноутбуці
4471 | height (noun): how tall something is, its vertical size | loc: висота
  EN TS: The pylon has a scary height!
  ua TS: В опори ЛЕП моторошна висота!
  EN FS: The bridge has a scary height!
  ua FS: У мосту моторошна висота!
  EN TP: the pylon's great height
  ua TP: велика висота опори
  EN FP: the height of a bridge
  ua FP: висота мосту
4472 | altitude (noun): height above sea level | loc: висота
  EN TS: He can't believe the altitude!
  ua TS: Він не вірить, яка тут висота!
  EN FS: He can't believe the heat!
  ua FS: Він не вірить, яка тут спека!
  EN TP: a cable car at altitude
  ua TP: канатна дорога на висоті
  EN FP: the altitude of a plane
  ua FP: висота польоту літака
4473 | yell (verb): to give a sudden loud cry | loc: скрикнути
  EN TS: The cactus made him yell!
  ua TS: Через кактус він аж скрикнув!
  EN FS: The snake made him yell!
  ua FS: Через змію він аж скрикнув!
  EN TP: yelling in the desert
  ua TP: скрикнути в пустелі
  EN FP: yelling in the snow
  ua FP: скрикнути в снігу
4474 | menu (noun): a list of dishes available at a restaurant | loc: меню
  EN TS: The menu is on the wall.
  ua TS: Меню на стіні.
  EN FS: The menu is on the table.
  ua FS: Меню на столі.
  EN TP: a coffee menu on boards
  ua TP: меню кави на дошках
  EN FP: a menu on a phone
  ua FP: меню в телефоні
4475 | display (verb): to show something, make it visible | loc: виставити
  EN TS: Cups are displayed on shelves.
  ua TS: Чашки виставлені на полицях.
  EN FS: Jars are displayed on shelves.
  ua FS: Банки виставлені на полицях.
  EN TP: cups displayed on shelves
  ua TP: чашки, виставлені на полицях
  EN FP: displaying a price list
  ua FP: виставити прайс-лист
4476 | hall (noun): a large entrance or reception room | loc: зала
  EN TS: What a huge cafe hall!
  ua TS: Яка величезна зала кафе!
  EN FS: What a tiny cafe hall!
  ua FS: Яка крихітна зала кафе!
  EN TP: a huge ornate hall
  ua TP: величезна розкішна зала
  EN FP: a school sports hall
  ua FP: шкільна спортивна зала
4477 | month (noun): one of the twelve parts of the year | loc: місяць
  EN TS: He is turning to a new month.
  ua TS: Він переходить до нового місяця.
  EN FS: He is turning to a new book.
  ua FS: Він переходить до нової книжки.
  EN TP: turning to a new month
  ua TP: перегорнути на новий місяць
  EN FP: a month at the beach
  ua FP: місяць на пляжі
4478 | date (noun): the specified day of the month | loc: дата
  EN TS: She marked a date. Big day!
  ua TS: Вона позначила дату. Великий день!
  EN FS: She marked a name. Big day!
  ua FS: Вона позначила ім’я. Великий день!
  EN TP: a date marked in red
  ua TP: дата, позначена червоним
  EN FP: a date at a restaurant
  ua FP: побачення в ресторані
4479 | hard (adjective): not easy, needing great effort | loc: важкий
  EN TS: This ride is hard work!
  ua TS: Цей заїзд — важка робота!
  EN FS: This ride is easy work!
  ua FS: Цей заїзд — легка робота!
  EN TP: a hard spin class
  ua TP: важке заняття з сайклу
  EN FP: a hard bike seat
  ua FP: тверде сідло велосипеда
4480 | curve (noun): a line that bends, changing direction | loc: крива
  EN TS: The dune makes a long curve.
  ua TS: Дюна утворює довгу криву.
  EN FS: The river makes a long curve.
  ua FS: Річка утворює довгу криву.
  EN TP: the curve of a dune
  ua TP: крива лінія дюни
  EN FP: a curve in the road
  ua FP: вигин дороги
4481 | focus (verb): to bring something to a central point | loc: сфокусувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is focusing like a pro.
  ua TS: Вона фокусує як профі.
  EN FS: She is cooking like a pro.
  ua FS: Вона готує як профі.
  EN TP: to focus the lens
  ua TP: сфокусувати об’єктив
  EN FP: to focus on homework
  ua FP: зосередитися на домашці
4482 | shoot (verb): to make a film or photograph of something | loc: знімати
  EN TS: She is shooting the rooftops.
  ua TS: Вона знімає дахи.
  EN FS: She is shooting the beach.
  ua FS: Вона знімає пляж.
  EN TP: shooting photos in the city
  ua TP: знімати фото в місті
  EN FP: shooting at a target
  ua FP: стріляти по мішені
4483 | log (noun): a piece of a tree trunk with the branches cut off | loc: колода
  EN TS: The cabin is made of logs.
  ua TS: Хатина складена з колод.
  EN FS: The cabin is made of bricks.
  ua FS: Хатина складена з цегли.
  EN TP: a cabin of stacked logs
  ua TP: хатина зі складених колод
  EN FP: a log on the ice
  ua FP: колода на льоду
4484 | dawn (noun): the first light of day | loc: світанок
  EN TS: Dawn lights up the peaks first.
  ua TS: Світанок першими освітлює вершини.
  EN FS: Dawn lights up the trees first.
  ua FS: Світанок першими освітлює дерева.
  EN TP: the first light of dawn
  ua TP: перше світло світанку
  EN FP: dawn in a busy city
  ua FP: світанок у гамірному місті
4485 | powerful (adjective): having great power or force | loc: потужний
  EN TS: Powerful falls, free shower!
  ua TS: Потужний водоспад — безкоштовний душ!
  EN FS: Powerful rain, free shower!
  ua FS: Потужна злива — безкоштовний душ!
  EN TP: a powerful waterfall
  ua TP: потужний водоспад
  EN FP: a powerful canoe engine
  ua FP: потужний мотор каное
4487 | kind (adjective): having a considerate and helpful nature | loc: добрий
  EN TS: What a kind guy!
  ua TS: Який добрий хлопець!
  EN FS: What a lazy guy!
  ua FS: Який ледачий хлопець!
  EN TP: a kind young man
  ua TP: добрий молодий чоловік
  EN FP: a kind of pancake
  ua FP: різновид млинця
4488 | document (noun): an official piece of writing with information | loc: документ
  EN TS: Every document gets a red X. Bad day at the office.
  ua TS: Кожен документ отримує червоний хрестик. Поганий день в офісі.
  EN FS: Every document gets a green tick. Bad day at the office.
  ua FS: Кожен документ отримує зелену галочку. Поганий день в офісі.
  EN TP: stamping a document
  ua TP: ставити печатку на документ
  EN FP: printing a document
  ua FP: друкувати документ
4489 | wax (noun): a soft substance from plant, animal or mineral | loc: віск
  EN TS: Melted wax is everywhere.
  ua TS: Розтоплений віск усюди.
  EN FS: Melted butter is everywhere.
  ua FS: Розтоплене масло всюди.
  EN TP: melted candle wax
  ua TP: розтоплений свічковий віск
  EN FP: a wax figure
  ua FP: воскова фігура
4490 | prepare (verb): to make ready in advance | loc: підготувати
  EN TS: She is preparing the table.
  ua TS: Вона підготовлює стіл.
  EN FS: She is cleaning the table.
  ua FS: Вона витирає стіл.
  EN TP: preparing a dinner table
  ua TP: підготувати стіл до вечері
  EN FP: preparing for a test
  ua FP: підготуватися до тесту
4491 | below (adverb): in or to a lower place | loc: внизу
  EN TS: The river is far below.
  ua TS: Річка далеко внизу.
  EN FS: The sun is far below.
  ua FS: Сонце далеко внизу.
  EN TP: a river far below
  ua TP: річка далеко внизу
  EN FP: clouds far below
  ua FP: хмари далеко внизу
4492 | impressive (adjective): making a strong impression | loc: вражаючий
  EN TS: The golden dome is impressive.
  ua TS: Золотий купол вражаючий.
  EN FS: The silver dome is impressive.
  ua FS: Срібний купол вражаючий.
  EN TP: an impressive golden dome
  ua TP: вражаючий золотий купол
  EN FP: an impressive exam result
  ua FP: вражаючий результат іспиту
4493 | struggle (verb): to make a strenuous effort | loc: боротися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is struggling at the wheel.
  ua TS: Він бореться з кермом.
  EN FS: He is sleeping at the wheel.
  ua FS: Він спить за кермом.
  EN TP: struggling with the wheel
  ua TP: боротися з кермом
  EN FP: struggling with a heavy bag
  ua FP: боротися з важкою сумкою
4495 | cost (noun): the total spent for goods or services | loc: вартість
  EN TS: The cost of the old car is 500 euros.
  ua TS: Вартість старої машини — 500 євро.
  EN FS: The cost of the old car is 5,000 euros.
  ua FS: Вартість старої машини — 5 000 євро.
  EN TP: the cost of a car
  ua TP: вартість машини
  EN FP: the cost of a flat
  ua FP: вартість квартири
4496 | lay (verb): to put something in a certain place | loc: покласти
  EN TS: He laid the rug on the floor.
  ua TS: Він поклав килим на підлогу.
  EN FS: He laid the rug on the bed.
  ua FS: Він поклав килим на ліжко.
  EN TP: to lay a rug down
  ua TP: покласти килим
  EN FP: to lay the table
  ua FP: накрити на стіл
4497 | hand (verb): to place something into someone's hands | loc: передати
  EN TS: He is handing over a coin.
  ua TS: Він передає монету.
  EN FS: He is handing over a key.
  ua FS: Він передає ключ.
  EN TP: handing over the change
  ua TP: передати решту
  EN FP: handing over a gift
  ua FP: передати подарунок
4498 | sign (verb): to mark with your signature | loc: підписати
  EN TS: Friends are signing his cast.
  ua TS: Друзі підписують його гіпс.
  EN FS: Friends are signing his shirt.
  ua FS: Друзі підписують його сорочку.
  EN TP: signing a plaster cast
  ua TP: підписати гіпс
  EN FP: signing a contract
  ua FP: підписати контракт
4499 | visit (verb): to go to see a place | loc: відвідати
  EN TS: Castles: he visits them all.
  ua TS: Замки: він відвідує їх усі.
  EN FS: Farms: he visits them all.
  ua FS: Ферми: він відвідує їх усі.
  EN TP: visiting old castles
  ua TP: відвідувати старі замки
  EN FP: visiting old friends
  ua FP: відвідувати старих друзів
4500 | quick (adjective): done rapidly, without delay | loc: швидкий
  EN TS: Quick hands save the day.
  ua TS: Швидкі руки рятують ситуацію.
  EN FS: Quick dogs save the day.
  ua FS: Швидкі собаки рятують ситуацію.
  EN TP: a quick catch
  ua TP: швидкий хват
  EN FP: a quick nap
  ua FP: швидкий денний сон
4501 | insect (noun): a small air-breathing creature with six legs | loc: комаха
  EN TS: This insect had a snack.
  ua TS: Ця комаха перекусила.
  EN FS: This bird had a snack.
  ua FS: Ця пташка перекусила.
  EN TP: an insect on a leaf
  ua TP: комаха на листку
  EN FP: an insect on a flower
  ua FP: комаха на квітці
4502 | ceiling (noun): the upper surface of a room, overhead | loc: стеля
  EN TS: Ceilings are so interesting.
  ua TS: Стелі — це так цікаво.
  EN FS: Floors are so interesting.
  ua FS: Підлоги — це так цікаво.
  EN TP: looking up at the ceiling
  ua TP: дивитися на стелю
  EN FP: painting the ceiling
  ua FP: фарбувати стелю
4503 | wish (verb): to hope for something | loc: бажати | translator note: TS uses the noun бажання (загадувати бажання = make a wish); the verb бажати does not fit
  EN TS: She is making a wish.
  ua TS: Вона загадує бажання.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  ua FS: Вона пече торт.
  EN TP: making a birthday wish
  ua TP: бажати чогось на день народження
  EN FP: wishing for rain
  ua FP: бажати дощу
4504 | success (noun): an event that achieves its intended purpose | loc: успіх
  EN TS: What a success!
  ua TS: Оце успіх!
  EN FS: What a failure!
  ua FS: Оце провал!
  EN TP: celebrating a big success
  ua TP: святкувати великий успіх
  EN FP: a success on stage
  ua FP: успіх на сцені
4505 | backwards (adverb): toward the back or rear | loc: назад
  EN TS: He is falling over backwards!
  ua TS: Він падає назад!
  EN FS: He is falling over forwards!
  ua FS: Він падає вперед!
  EN TP: falling backwards off a chair
  ua TP: падати назад зі стільця
  EN FP: walking backwards to the table
  ua FP: іти назад до столу
4506 | comfort (noun): a relaxed state with no pain | loc: комфорт
  EN TS: Comfort? The green chair wins.
  ua TS: Комфорт? Перемагає зелене крісло.
  EN FS: Comfort? The white chair wins.
  ua FS: Комфорт? Перемагає біле крісло.
  EN TP: comfort in a big armchair
  ua TP: комфорт у великому кріслі
  EN FP: comfort on a kitchen chair
  ua FP: комфорт на кухонному стільці
4507 | tag (noun): a label attached to something, showing its owner | loc: бирка
  EN TS: The agent is attaching a tag.
  ua TS: Агент чіпляє бирку.
  EN FS: The agent is attaching a lock.
  ua FS: Агент чіпляє замок.
  EN TP: a tag on a suitcase
  ua TP: бирка на валізі
  EN FP: a jacket name tag
  ua FP: бирка з ім’ям на куртці
4508 | load (verb): to fill or place a load on something | loc: завантажити
  EN TS: He's loading bags like a boss.
  ua TS: Він завантажує сумки як бос.
  EN FS: He's loading food like a boss.
  ua FS: Він завантажує їжу як бос.
  EN TP: loading bags onto the belt
  ua TP: завантажувати сумки на стрічку
  EN FP: loading a truck with boxes
  ua FP: завантажувати вантажівку коробками
4509 | weigh (verb): to have a certain weight | loc: важити
  EN TS: The bag weighs 12.95 kg. Accepted.
  ua TS: Сумка важить 12,95 кг. Прийнято.
  EN FS: The bag weighs 21.95 kg. Accepted.
  ua FS: Сумка важить 21,95 кг. Прийнято.
  EN TP: weighing a bag
  ua TP: зважувати сумку
  EN FP: weighing the fruit
  ua FP: зважувати фрукти
4510 | check (verb): to examine something to see if it is right | loc: перевіряти
  EN TS: She is checking her ticket. Wrong gate?
  ua TS: Вона перевіряє квиток. Не той вихід?
  EN FS: She is checking her phone. Wrong gate?
  ua FS: Вона перевіряє телефон. Не той вихід?
  EN TP: checking the flight board
  ua TP: перевіряти табло рейсів
  EN FP: checking her bag
  ua FP: перевіряти сумку
4511 | service (noun): work done by one person that benefits another | loc: обслуговування
  EN TS: The service here is excellent.
  ua TS: Обслуговування тут чудове.
  EN FS: The service here is rude.
  ua FS: Обслуговування тут грубе.
  EN TP: friendly service at a desk
  ua TP: привітне обслуговування за стійкою
  EN FP: room service in a hotel
  ua FP: обслуговування номерів у готелі
4512 | list (noun): an ordered set of names or items | loc: список
  EN TS: He is checking his list.
  ua TS: Він перевіряє свій список.
  EN FS: He is checking his phone.
  ua FS: Він перевіряє свій телефон.
  EN TP: ticking off a list
  ua TP: викреслювати пункти зі списку
  EN FP: writing a shopping list
  ua FP: писати список покупок
4513 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: валіза
  EN TS: All good: suitcase and ticket.
  ua TS: Усе гаразд: валіза і квиток.
  EN FS: All good: backpack and ticket.
  ua FS: Усе гаразд: рюкзак і квиток.
  EN TP: a suitcase at the airport
  ua TP: валіза в аеропорту
  EN FP: a suitcase on a train
  ua FP: валіза в потязі
4514 | skill (noun): an ability you gain by training | loc: навичка
  EN TS: The chef has crazy skills.
  ua TS: У шефа шалені навички.
  EN FS: The waiter has crazy skills.
  ua FS: В офіціанта шалені навички.
  EN TP: a chef's cooking skill
  ua TP: кулінарна навичка шефа
  EN FP: a juggling skill
  ua FP: навичка жонглювання
4515 | to win (verb): to be the winner in a contest | loc: вигравати
  EN TS: He won a medal. You bet!
  ua TS: Він виграв медаль. Ще б пак!
  EN FS: He won a cup. You bet!
  ua FS: Він виграв кубок. Ще б пак!
  EN TP: to win a medal
  ua TP: виграти медаль
  EN FP: to win a car
  ua FP: виграти машину
4516 | hay (noun): dried grass used as food for animals | loc: сіно
  EN TS: The barn floor is full of hay.
  ua TS: Підлога сараю вкрита сіном.
  EN FS: The barn floor is full of mud.
  ua FS: Підлога сараю вкрита багнюкою.
  EN TP: a nest made of hay
  ua TP: гніздо з сіна
  EN FP: hay bales on a truck
  ua FP: тюки сіна на вантажівці
4517 | pull (noun): the act of pulling something toward you | loc: ривок
  EN TS: He is giving the rope a pull.
  ua TS: Він тягне мотузку ривком.
  EN FS: He is giving the rope a cut.
  ua FS: Він ріже мотузку ножем.
  EN TP: a pull on the rope
  ua TP: ривок за мотузку
  EN FP: the pull of the moon
  ua FP: притягання Місяця
4519 | ash (noun): what remains when something is burned | loc: попіл
  EN TS: He's stacking logs on the ash.
  ua TS: Він кладе поліна на попіл.
  EN FS: He's stacking logs on the rug.
  ua FS: Він кладе поліна на килим.
  EN TP: a thick bed of ash
  ua TP: товстий шар попелу
  EN FP: an old ash tree
  ua FP: старий ясен
4520 | stretch (verb): to spread over a large, long area | loc: простягатися
  EN TS: The wall stretches forever.
  ua TS: Стіна простягається без кінця.
  EN FS: The river stretches forever.
  ua FS: Річка простягається без кінця.
  EN TP: stretching over the mountains
  ua TP: простягатися над горами
  EN FP: stretching before a run
  ua FP: розтягуватися перед пробіжкою
4521 | distance (noun): a far away region | loc: далечінь
  EN TS: Towers fade in the distance.
  ua TS: Вежі тануть у далечіні.
  EN FS: Houses fade in the distance.
  ua FS: Будинки тануть у далечіні.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  ua TP: вежі в далечіні
  EN FP: a long-distance phone call
  ua FP: міжміський дзвінок
4522 | tour (noun): a journey all the way around a place | loc: тур
  EN TS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and dumplings!
  ua TS: У її турі — стіна, човен і пельмені!
  EN FS: Her tour has a wall, a boat and pizza!
  ua FS: У її турі — стіна, човен і піца!
  EN TP: a tour of China
  ua TP: тур Китаєм
  EN FP: a tour of Italy
  ua FP: тур Італією
4524 | fold (verb): to bend so that one part covers the other | loc: скласти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Perfectly folded dumplings.
  ua TS: Ідеально складені пельмені.
  EN FS: Perfectly folded napkins.
  ua FS: Ідеально складені серветки.
  EN TP: folding dumpling edges
  ua TP: складати краї пельменів
  EN FP: folding clean laundry
  ua FP: складати чисту білизну
4525 | help (verb): to give help or assistance to someone | loc: допомагати
  EN TS: She helped him breathe again.
  ua TS: Вона допомогла йому знову дихати.
  EN FS: She helped him stand up again.
  ua FS: Вона допомогла йому знову встати.
  EN TP: helping a choking man
  ua TP: допомагати чоловікові, що вдавився
  EN FP: helping with the dishes
  ua FP: допомагати з посудом
4526 | election (noun): a vote to choose a winner for a position | loc: вибори
  EN TS: She is thinking very hard about this election.
  ua TS: Вона дуже старанно думає про ці вибори.
  EN FS: He is thinking very hard about this election.
  ua FS: Він дуже старанно думає про ці вибори.
  EN TP: voting in an election
  ua TP: голосувати на виборах
  EN FP: winning an election
  ua FP: виграти вибори
4527 | vegetable (noun): a plant part you eat, like roots, leaves or stems | loc: овоч
  EN TS: He is chopping vegetables!
  ua TS: Він ріже овочі!
  EN FS: He is chopping meat!
  ua FS: Він ріже м’ясо!
  EN TP: chopping vegetables
  ua TP: різати овочі
  EN FP: washing vegetables
  ua FP: мити овочі
4528 | grave (noun): a place in the ground where a dead body is buried | loc: могила
  EN TS: Old graves surround the church.
  ua TS: Старі могили оточують церкву.
  EN FS: Old graves surround the castle.
  ua FS: Старі могили оточують замок.
  EN TP: graves around a church
  ua TP: могили довкола церкви
  EN FP: graves on a battlefield
  ua FP: могили на полі бою
4529 | color (noun): what things look like from the light they reflect | loc: колір
  EN TS: Floor full of color. Magic!
  ua TS: Підлога повна кольорів. Магія!
  EN FS: Floor full of water. Magic!
  ua FS: Підлога повна води. Магія!
  EN TP: colors on a stone floor
  ua TP: кольори на кам’яній підлозі
  EN FP: colors on a painted wall
  ua FP: кольори на розмальованій стіні
4530 | film (noun): a story told with moving pictures and sound | loc: фільм
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying at the film!
  ua TS: На фільмі літає попкорн!
  EN FS: Drinks are flying at the film!
  ua FS: На фільмі літають напої!
  EN TP: watching a film
  ua TP: дивитися фільм
  EN FP: making a film
  ua FP: знімати фільм
4531 | popcorn (noun): corn heated until it bursts into white pieces | loc: попкорн
  EN TS: She is ready with her popcorn.
  ua TS: Вона готова, попкорн у руках.
  EN FS: She is ready with her pizza.
  ua FS: Вона готова, піца в руках.
  EN TP: a big tub of popcorn
  ua TP: велике відро попкорну
  EN FP: making popcorn at home
  ua FP: робити попкорн удома
4532 | trash (noun): worthless material to be thrown away | loc: сміття
  EN TS: Park duty: picking up trash.
  ua TS: Чергування в парку: збираємо сміття.
  EN FS: Park duty: picking up flowers.
  ua FS: Чергування в парку: збираємо квіти.
  EN TP: picking up park trash
  ua TP: збирати сміття в парку
  EN FP: a full trash can
  ua FP: повний смітник
4533 | court (noun): a room in which a law court sits | loc: зала суду
  EN TS: They are celebrating in court.
  ua TS: Вони святкують у залі суду.
  EN FS: They are crying in court.
  ua FS: Вони плачуть у залі суду.
  EN TP: a happy family in court
  ua TP: щаслива родина в залі суду
  EN FP: a tennis court party
  ua FP: вечірка на тенісному корті
4534 | official (noun): a worker who holds an office | loc: посадовець
  EN TS: The official wears a chain.
  ua TS: Посадовець носить ланцюг.
  EN FS: The official wears a crown.
  ua FS: Посадовець носить корону.
  EN TP: an official with a chain
  ua TP: посадовець із ланцюгом
  EN FP: an official stamping passports
  ua FP: посадовець ставить печатки
4535 | lesson (noun): a unit of instruction | loc: урок
  EN TS: He is throwing paper during the lesson!
  ua TS: Він кидається папірцями на уроці!
  EN FS: He is throwing chalk during the lesson!
  ua FS: Він кидається крейдою на уроці!
  EN TP: a math lesson
  ua TP: урок математики
  EN FP: a swimming lesson
  ua FP: урок плавання
4536 | craft (noun): the skilled practice of a practical job | loc: ремесло
  EN TS: The craft here is pottery.
  ua TS: Ремесло тут — гончарство.
  EN FS: The craft here is painting.
  ua FS: Ремесло тут — живопис.
  EN TP: the craft of pottery
  ua TP: ремесло гончара
  EN FP: the craft of glassmaking
  ua FP: ремесло склодува
4537 | clear (verb): to rid a place of obstructions | loc: звільнити
  EN TS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she collapsed.
  ua TS: Вона звільнила всю квартиру. А тоді впала без сил.
  EN FS: She cleared the whole flat. Then she danced.
  ua FS: Вона звільнила всю квартиру. А тоді затанцювала.
  EN TP: clearing the shelves
  ua TP: звільняти полиці
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  ua FP: прокашлятися
4538 | rest (noun): freedom from work or activity | loc: відпочинок
  EN TS: Task done. Time for a rest.
  ua TS: Завдання виконано. Час на відпочинок.
  EN FS: Task done. Time for a run.
  ua FS: Завдання виконано. Час на пробіжку.
  EN TP: a rest on the sofa
  ua TP: відпочинок на дивані
  EN FP: a highway rest stop
  ua FP: зона відпочинку біля траси
4539 | cartoon (noun): a humorous drawing in a newspaper | loc: карикатура
  EN TS: The cartoon man is mopping.
  ua TS: Чоловік на карикатурі миє підлогу.
  EN FS: The cartoon man is cooking.
  ua FS: Чоловік на карикатурі готує.
  EN TP: a cartoon of a cleaner
  ua TP: карикатура на прибиральника
  EN FP: a cartoon of a cook
  ua FP: карикатура на кухаря
4540 | equipment (noun): the things needed to do a job or service | loc: обладнання
  EN TS: Proper safety equipment.
  ua TS: Належне захисне обладнання.
  EN FS: Proper diving equipment.
  ua FS: Належне водолазне обладнання.
  EN TP: window-cleaning equipment
  ua TP: обладнання для миття вікон
  EN FP: gym equipment in a hall
  ua FP: спортивне обладнання в залі
4541 | filthy (adjective): disgustingly dirty | loc: брудний
  EN TS: The sink was filthy with hair!
  ua TS: Раковина була брудна від волосся!
  EN FS: The sink was filthy with mud!
  ua FS: Раковина була брудна від багнюки!
  EN TP: a filthy hairy basin
  ua TP: брудна раковина у волоссі
  EN FP: filthy boots by the door
  ua FP: брудні черевики біля дверей
4542 | agreement (noun): a statement of promises exchanged | loc: угода
  EN TS: They reached an agreement.
  ua TS: Вони дійшли до угоди.
  EN FS: They reached the airport.
  ua FS: Вони дійшли до аеропорту.
  EN TP: shaking hands on an agreement
  ua TP: потиснути руки на знак угоди
  EN FP: a rental agreement
  ua FP: угода про оренду
4543 | risk (noun): a source of danger, a chance of loss | loc: ризик
  EN TS: That thin rope is a tiny risk.
  ua TS: Ця тонка мотузка — крихітний ризик.
  EN FS: That ladder is a tiny risk.
  ua FS: Ця драбина — крихітний ризик.
  EN TP: risk on a sea cliff
  ua TP: ризик на морській скелі
  EN FP: risk in a casino
  ua FP: ризик у казино
4544 | contrast (noun): the difference between things that are compared | loc: контраст
  EN TS: Sand and ice. Small contrast.
  ua TS: Пісок і лід. Невеличкий контраст.
  EN FS: Sea and ice. Small contrast.
  ua FS: Море і лід. Невеличкий контраст.
  EN TP: sand and ice in contrast
  ua TP: контраст піску й льоду
  EN FP: day and night in contrast
  ua FP: контраст дня й ночі
4545 | strength (noun): being physically or mentally strong | loc: сила
  EN TS: She has huge finger strength.
  ua TS: У неї величезна сила пальців.
  EN FS: He has huge finger strength.
  ua FS: У нього величезна сила пальців.
  EN TP: strength in her fingers
  ua TP: сила в її пальцях
  EN FP: strength in her legs
  ua FP: сила в її ногах
4546 | surgery (noun): a room where you see a doctor or dentist | loc: кабінет лікаря
  EN TS: The surgery has a green couch.
  ua TS: У кабінеті лікаря зелена кушетка.
  EN FS: The surgery has a red couch.
  ua FS: У кабінеті лікаря червона кушетка.
  EN TP: a boy in the surgery
  ua TP: хлопчик у кабінеті лікаря
  EN FP: a boy having surgery
  ua FP: хлопчика оперують
4547 | waiting room (noun): a room with seats where people wait | loc: зала очікування
  EN TS: They are in the waiting room.
  ua TS: Вони в залі очікування.
  EN FS: They are in the dining room.
  ua FS: Вони в їдальні.
  EN TP: sitting in a waiting room
  ua TP: сидіти в залі очікування
  EN FP: sitting in a living room
  ua FP: сидіти у вітальні
4548 | late (adverb): later than usual or expected | loc: пізно
  EN TS: Oh no, he woke up late!
  ua TS: О ні, він прокинувся пізно!
  EN FS: Oh no, he woke up early!
  ua FS: О ні, він прокинувся рано!
  EN TP: waking up late
  ua TP: прокинутися пізно
  EN FP: working late
  ua FP: працювати пізно
4549 | fuel (noun): a substance burned to produce energy | loc: паливо
  EN TS: He is shovelling fuel.
  ua TS: Він кидає лопатою паливо.
  EN FS: He is shovelling snow.
  ua FS: Він кидає лопатою сніг.
  EN TP: shovelling black fuel
  ua TP: кидати лопатою чорне паливо
  EN FP: fuel for a rocket
  ua FP: паливо для ракети
4550 | finally (adverb): after a long delay, at last | loc: нарешті
  EN TS: Finally, coffee. She is alive.
  ua TS: Нарешті кава. Вона ожила.
  EN FS: Finally, tea. She is alive.
  ua FS: Нарешті чай. Вона ожила.
  EN TP: finally drinking coffee
  ua TP: нарешті п’є каву
  EN FP: finally going to bed
  ua FP: нарешті йде спати
4551 | camp (verb): to live in a tent | loc: таборувати
  EN TS: Cheap tent. Great camping!
  ua TS: Дешевий намет. Чудове таборування!
  EN FS: Cheap car. Great camping!
  ua FS: Дешева машина. Чудове таборування!
  EN TP: camping by a lake
  ua TP: таборувати біля озера
  EN FP: camping in the snow
  ua FP: таборувати в снігу
4553 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: волосся
  EN TS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the dog.
  ua TS: Одна щітка для її волосся, а потім та сама — для собаки.
  EN FS: One brush for her hair, then the same one for the cat.
  ua FS: Одна щітка для її волосся, а потім та сама — для кота.
  EN TP: brushing long dark hair
  ua TP: розчісувати довге темне волосся
  EN FP: dog hair on a sofa
  ua FP: собача шерсть на дивані
4554 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: полум'я
  EN TS: A wall of flame, and he keeps cooking.
  ua TS: Стіна полум'я, а він собі готує далі.
  EN FS: A wall of water, and he keeps cooking.
  ua FS: Стіна води, а він собі готує далі.
  EN TP: a wall of orange flame
  ua TP: стіна помаранчевого полум'я
  EN FP: a candle flame at dinner
  ua FP: полум'я свічки за вечерею
4555 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: сосна
  EN TS: Pines below, peaks ahead.
  ua TS: Внизу сосни, попереду вершини.
  EN FS: Palms below, peaks ahead.
  ua FS: Внизу пальми, попереду вершини.
  EN TP: rows of snowy pines
  ua TP: ряди засніжених сосен
  EN FP: a pine kitchen table
  ua FP: сосновий кухонний стіл
4556 | praise (verb): to express approval of someone | loc: хвалити
  EN TS: The whole team is praising him.
  ua TS: Уся команда його хвалить.
  EN FS: The whole team is ignoring him.
  ua FS: Уся команда його ігнорує.
  EN TP: praising a colleague
  ua TP: хвалити колегу
  EN FP: praising a dog
  ua FP: хвалити пса
4557 | lap (noun): the top of your thighs when you sit | loc: коліна
  EN TS: The dog stole his lap!
  ua TS: Пес зайняв його коліна!
  EN FS: The cat stole his lap!
  ua FS: Кіт зайняв його коліна!
  EN TP: a dog on his lap
  ua TP: пес на його колінах
  EN FP: a lap around the track
  ua FP: коло на біговій доріжці
4558 | support (noun): help given to a person or cause | loc: підтримка
  EN TS: His friends are his support.
  ua TS: Друзі — його підтримка.
  EN FS: His parents are his support.
  ua FS: Батьки — його підтримка.
  EN TP: support from friends
  ua TP: підтримка від друзів
  EN FP: support from his parents
  ua FP: підтримка від батьків
4559 | console (verb): to give emotional strength to someone sad | loc: утішити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Friends are consoling him.
  ua TS: Друзі утішають його.
  EN FS: Friends are teasing him.
  ua FS: Друзі дражнять його.
  EN TP: consoling a crying friend
  ua TP: утішати друга, що плаче
  EN FP: playing on a console
  ua FP: грати на консолі
4560 | crew (noun): the men and women who run a ship or aircraft | loc: екіпаж
  EN TS: The crew is rowing in time.
  ua TS: Екіпаж веслує в такт.
  EN FS: The crew is singing in time.
  ua FS: Екіпаж співає в такт.
  EN TP: a rowing crew
  ua TP: екіпаж веслярів
  EN FP: a film crew
  ua FP: знімальна група
4561 | command (noun): an instruction with authority to do something | loc: команда
  EN TS: She is shouting commands.
  ua TS: Вона вигукує команди.
  EN FS: She is whispering commands.
  ua FS: Вона шепоче команди.
  EN TP: shouting commands
  ua TP: вигукувати команди
  EN FP: typing commands
  ua FP: вводити команди
4562 | direction (noun): the line leading to a place | loc: напрямок
  EN TS: She is checking the direction. Serious face.
  ua TS: Вона перевіряє напрямок. Серйозне обличчя.
  EN FS: She is checking the time. Serious face.
  ua FS: Вона перевіряє час. Серйозне обличчя.
  EN TP: finding the right direction
  ua TP: шукати правильний напрямок
  EN FP: asking for directions
  ua FP: питати дорогу
4563 | law (noun): a legal document of rules for an activity | loc: закон
  EN TS: The law book has gold corners.
  ua TS: Книга законів має золоті кути.
  EN FS: The law book has iron corners.
  ua FS: Книга законів має залізні кути.
  EN TP: a huge book of law
  ua TP: величезна книга законів
  EN FP: breaking the law
  ua FP: порушити закон
4564 | cooperation (noun): working together, joint action | loc: співпраця
  EN TS: The barn needs cooperation.
  ua TS: Сарай потребує співпраці.
  EN FS: The boat needs cooperation.
  ua FS: Човен потребує співпраці.
  EN TP: cooperation at a barn raising
  ua TP: співпраця під час будівництва сараю
  EN FP: cooperation between countries
  ua FP: співпраця між країнами
4565 | globe (noun): an object shaped like a ball | loc: куля
  EN TS: The Earth looks like a globe.
  ua TS: Земля схожа на кулю.
  EN FS: The Moon looks like a globe.
  ua FS: Місяць схожий на кулю.
  EN TP: a blue and green globe
  ua TP: синьо-зелена куля
  EN FP: a globe on a desk
  ua FP: глобус на столі
4566 | summit (noun): the top point of a mountain or hill | loc: вершина
  EN TS: She is reaching the summit!
  ua TS: Вона досягає вершини!
  EN FS: She is reaching the river!
  ua FS: Вона досягає річки!
  EN TP: reaching the summit
  ua TP: досягти вершини
  EN FP: a summit of world leaders
  ua FP: саміт світових лідерів
4567 | ill (adjective): affected by a physical or mental problem | loc: хворий
  EN TS: She looks a bit ill.
  ua TS: Вона виглядає трохи хворою.
  EN FS: She looks very happy.
  ua FS: Вона виглядає дуже щасливою.
  EN TP: ill and coughing
  ua TP: хвора й кашляє
  EN FP: ill in bed
  ua FP: хвора в ліжку
4568 | continent (noun): one of the large landmasses of the earth | loc: континент
  EN TS: She is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  ua TS: Вона стрибає по всіх континентах. Дешеві подорожі!
  EN FS: He is jumping on every continent. Cheap travel!
  ua FS: Він стрибає по всіх континентах. Дешеві подорожі!
  EN TP: jumping on a continent
  ua TP: стрибати на континенті
  EN FP: drawing a continent
  ua FP: малювати континент
4569 | to fry (verb): to cook food in hot oil in a pan | loc: смажити
  EN TS: He is frying fish. Van life!
  ua TS: Він смажить рибу. Життя у фургоні!
  EN FS: He is frying eggs. Van life!
  ua FS: Він смажить яйця. Життя у фургоні!
  EN TP: frying fish in a van
  ua TP: смажити рибу у фургоні
  EN FP: frying fish on a boat
  ua FP: смажити рибу на човні
4570 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: шеф-кухар
  EN TS: The chef is plating pork.
  ua TS: Шеф-кухар викладає свинину.
  EN FS: The chef is plating fish.
  ua FS: Шеф-кухар викладає рибу.
  EN TP: a chef plating a dish
  ua TP: шеф-кухар подає страву
  EN FP: a chef eating a dish
  ua FP: шеф-кухар їсть страву
4571 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: штовхати
  EN TS: Everyone is pushing the boat.
  ua TS: Усі штовхають човен.
  EN FS: Everyone is pushing the car.
  ua FS: Усі штовхають машину.
  EN TP: pushing a boat to sea
  ua TP: штовхати човен у море
  EN FP: pushing a car uphill
  ua FP: штовхати машину вгору
4572 | correct (verb): to make something right | loc: виправити
  EN TS: She will correct them forever.
  ua TS: Вона виправлятиме їх вічно.
  EN FS: He will correct them forever.
  ua FS: Він виправлятиме їх вічно.
  EN TP: correcting exam papers
  ua TP: виправляти екзаменаційні роботи
  EN FP: correcting her posture
  ua FP: виправляти поставу
4573 | secret (adjective): kept private, not open or public | loc: таємний
  EN TS: A secret deal over cash.
  ua TS: Таємна угода з готівкою.
  EN FS: A secret deal over coffee.
  ua FS: Таємна угода за кавою.
  EN TP: a secret cash deal
  ua TP: таємна угода готівкою
  EN FP: a secret love letter
  ua FP: таємний любовний лист
4575 | cold (noun): a mild viral infection of the nose and throat | loc: застуда
  EN TS: Her cold came to the library.
  ua TS: Її застуда прийшла в бібліотеку.
  EN FS: Her cold came to the cinema.
  ua FS: Її застуда прийшла в кіно.
  EN TP: a cold in the library
  ua TP: застуда в бібліотеці
  EN FP: a cold in the snow
  ua FP: застуда на снігу
4576 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: рахувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is counting a mountain of paper.
  ua TS: Вона рахує гору паперу.
  EN FS: She is counting a mountain of coins.
  ua FS: Вона рахує гору монет.
  EN TP: counting sheets of paper
  ua TP: рахувати аркуші паперу
  EN FP: counting coins on a table
  ua FP: рахувати монети на столі
4577 | country (noun): the territory of a nation | loc: країна
  EN TS: She is showing us her country.
  ua TS: Вона показує нам свою країну.
  EN FS: She is showing us her ship.
  ua FS: Вона показує нам свій корабель.
  EN TP: a country of fields
  ua TP: країна полів
  EN FP: a country house
  ua FP: заміський будинок
4578 | crop (noun): what plants yield in one growing season | loc: урожай
  EN TS: Crop fields form a patchwork.
  ua TS: Поля з урожаєм складаються в клаптикову ковдру.
  EN FS: Car parks form a patchwork.
  ua FS: Парковки складаються в клаптикову ковдру.
  EN TP: fields of green crops
  ua TP: поля зеленого урожаю
  EN FP: a crop of apples
  ua FP: урожай яблук
4579 | abroad (adverb): to or in a foreign country | loc: за кордоном
  EN TS: She travels abroad a lot!
  ua TS: Вона часто подорожує за кордоном!
  EN FS: She stays at home a lot!
  ua FS: Вона часто сидить удома!
  EN TP: travelling abroad
  ua TP: подорожі за кордоном
  EN FP: studying abroad
  ua FP: навчання за кордоном
4580 | date (noun): a meeting arranged in advance | loc: побачення
  EN TS: Their date has one milkshake.
  ua TS: На їхньому побаченні один молочний коктейль.
  EN FS: Their date has one pizza.
  ua FS: На їхньому побаченні одна піца.
  EN TP: a milkshake date
  ua TP: побачення з молочним коктейлем
  EN FP: the date on a calendar
  ua FP: дата в календарі
4581 | candy (noun): a sweet made of flavored sugar | loc: цукерка
  EN TS: A blanket den full of candy.
  ua TS: Халабуда з ковдр, повна цукерок.
  EN FS: A blanket den full of books.
  ua FS: Халабуда з ковдр, повна книжок.
  EN TP: a bowl of candy
  ua TP: миска цукерок
  EN FP: a candy shop window
  ua FP: вітрина кондитерської
4582 | measure (verb): to find the size or measurements of something | loc: вимірювати
  EN TS: An adult is measuring them.
  ua TS: Дорослий вимірює їх.
  EN FS: An adult is feeding them.
  ua FS: Дорослий годує їх.
  EN TP: to measure who is taller
  ua TP: вимірювати, хто вищий
  EN FP: to measure a room
  ua FP: вимірювати кімнату
4583 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: литка
  EN TS: Ouch! He is holding his calf.
  ua TS: Ой! Він тримається за литку.
  EN FS: Ouch! He is holding his head.
  ua FS: Ой! Він тримається за голову.
  EN TP: a cramp in his calf
  ua TP: судома в литці
  EN FP: a calf in a field
  ua FP: теля в полі
4584 | trail (noun): a track or mark left by something passing | loc: слід
  EN TS: The turtle left a trail.
  ua TS: Черепаха залишила слід.
  EN FS: The crab left a trail.
  ua FS: Краб залишив слід.
  EN TP: a trail of flipper prints
  ua TP: слід від ластів
  EN FP: a hiking trail
  ua FP: туристична стежка
4585 | crossing (noun): traveling across something | loc: перехід
  EN TS: Beret, baguette, stylish crossing.
  ua TS: Берет, багет, стильний перехід.
  EN FS: Beret, guitar, stylish crossing.
  ua FS: Берет, гітара, стильний перехід.
  EN TP: a crossing with a baguette
  ua TP: перехід із багетом
  EN FP: a border crossing by car
  ua FP: перетин кордону машиною
4586 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: пішохідний перехід
  EN TS: She is on the crosswalk.
  ua TS: Вона на пішохідному переході.
  EN FS: She is on the bridge.
  ua FS: Вона на мосту.
  EN TP: a busy Paris crosswalk
  ua TP: людний пішохідний перехід у Парижі
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the snow
  ua FP: пішохідний перехід у снігу
4587 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: велосипедист
  EN TS: No way! The cyclist is surprised.
  ua TS: Не може бути! Велосипедист здивований.
  EN FS: No way! The cyclist is sleeping.
  ua FS: Не може бути! Велосипедист спить.
  EN TP: a cyclist at a junction
  ua TP: велосипедист на перехресті
  EN FP: a cyclist at a race
  ua FP: велосипедист на перегонах
4588 | traffic (noun): the vehicles and people moving along a place | loc: рух
  EN TS: The traffic is stopped.
  ua TS: Рух зупинився.
  EN FS: The traffic is moving.
  ua FS: Рух триває.
  EN TP: stopped traffic at night
  ua TP: зупинений рух уночі
  EN FP: heavy traffic in the day
  ua FP: жвавий рух удень
4589 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: пішохід
  EN TS: So many pedestrians!
  ua TS: Скільки пішоходів!
  EN FS: So many cyclists!
  ua FS: Скільки велосипедистів!
  EN TP: pedestrians on a junction
  ua TP: пішоходи на перехресті
  EN FP: a pedestrian zone with shops
  ua FP: пішохідна зона з магазинами
4590 | vacation (noun): leisure time away from work for rest or fun | loc: відпустка
  EN TS: Vacation mode: big splash!
  ua TS: Режим відпустки: великий бульк!
  EN FS: Vacation mode: long nap!
  ua FS: Режим відпустки: довгий сон!
  EN TP: a vacation on a ship
  ua TP: відпустка на кораблі
  EN FP: a vacation on a train
  ua FP: відпустка в потязі
4591 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: корабель
  EN TS: The ship offers a pool on the top deck.
  ua TS: На верхній палубі корабля є басейн.
  EN FS: The ship offers a cinema on the top deck.
  ua FS: На верхній палубі корабля є кінотеатр.
  EN TP: a big passenger ship
  ua TP: великий пасажирський корабель
  EN FP: a big cargo ship
  ua FP: великий вантажний корабель
4592 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: ступня
  EN TS: Wine made with feet. Tasty?
  ua TS: Вино, зроблене ступнями. Смачно?
  EN FS: Beer made with feet. Tasty?
  ua FS: Пиво, зроблене ступнями. Смачно?
  EN TP: bare feet in grapes
  ua TP: босі ступні у винограді
  EN FP: bare feet in the sand
  ua FP: босі ступні в піску
4593 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: лікарня
  EN TS: He is walking in the hospital.
  ua TS: Він іде лікарнею.
  EN FS: He is running in the hospital.
  ua FS: Він біжить лікарнею.
  EN TP: a long hospital corridor
  ua TP: довгий коридор лікарні
  EN FP: a hospital car park
  ua FP: парковка лікарні
